North Carolina, session 2025, HB1003.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. CREMATIONS AND ALKALINE HYDROLYSIS
SECTION 1.1.(a) The following provisions are recodified as follows:
Former Citation Recodified Citation
90-210.121(1) 90-210.121(1a)
90-210.121(17a) 90-210.121(17c)
90-210.136(a)(1) 90-210.121(1)
90-210.136(a)(2) 90-210.121(17a)
90-210.136(a)(3) 90-210.121(17b)
90-210.136(a)(4) 90-210.121(17d).
SECTION 1.1.(b) The title of Article 13F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Cremations.Cremations and Alkaline Hydrolysis."
SECTION 1.1.(c) G.S. 90-210.121, as amended by subsection (a) of this section,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.121. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) Alkaline hydrolysis. – The technical process using water, heat, and other
chemicals to destroy, dissolve, or reduce human remains to simpler or
essential elements.As defined in G.S. 90-210.20.
(1a) "Authorizing agent" means a Authorizing agent. – A person or entity legally
entitled to authorize the cremation arrange for the final disposition of human
remains in accordance with G.S. 90-210.124.G.S. 130A-420.
(2) "Board" means the Board. – The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service.
(3) "Body parts" means limbs Body parts. – Any of the following:
a. Limbs or other portions of the anatomy that are removed from a person
or human remains for medical purposes during treatment, surgery,
biopsy, autopsy, or medical research; or human research.
b. Human bodies or any portion thereof that have been donated to science
for medical purposes.
(4) "Casket" means a Casket. – A rigid container that is designed for the
encasement of human remains and that is usually constructed of wood, metal,
or other material and ornamented and lined with fabric, and which may or may
not be combustible.
(5) "Certificate of cremation" means a Certificate of cremation. – A certificate
provided by the crematory manager who performed the cremation containing,
at a minimum, all of the following information:
a. Name of decedent;decedent.
b. Date of cremation;cremation.
*H1003-v-5*

c. Name and address of crematory; andcrematory.
d. Signature of crematory manager or person acting as crematory
manager.
(6) "Cremated remains" means all Cremated remains. – All human remains
recovered after the completion of the cremation process, including
pulverization which leaves only bone fragments reduced to unidentifiable
dimensions.
(7) "Cremation" means the Cremation. – The technical process, using intense heat
and flame, that reduces human remains to bone fragments. Cremation includes
the processing and may include the pulverization of the bone fragments.
(8) "Cremation chamber" means the Cremation chamber. – The enclosed space
within which the cremation process takes place. Cremation chambers covered
by this Article shall be used exclusively for the cremation of human remains.
(9) "Cremation container" means the Cremation container. – The container in
which the human remains are transported to the crematory or placed therein
upon arrival for storage and placement in a cremation chamber for cremation.
A cremation container shall comply with all of the following standards:
a. Be composed of readily combustible materials suitable for
cremation;cremation.
b. Be able to be closed in order to provide a complete covering for the
human remains;remains.
c. Be resistant to leakage or spillage;spillage.
d. Be rigid enough for handling with ease;ease.
e. Be able to provide protection for the health, safety, and personal
integrity of crematory personnel; andpersonnel.
f. Be easily identifiable. The covering of the cremation container shall
contain all of the following information:
1. The name of the decedent;decedent.
2. The date of death;death.
3. The sex of the decedent; anddecedent.
4. The age at death of the decedent.
(10) "Cremation interment container" means a Cremation interment container. – A
rigid outer container composed of concrete, steel, fiberglass, or some similar
material in which an urn is placed prior to being interred in the ground and
which is designed to withstand prolonged exposure to the elements and to
support the earth above the urn.
(11) "Crematory" or "crematorium" means the Crematory or crematorium. – The
building or buildings or portion of a building on a single site that houses the
cremation equipment, the holding and processing facilities, the business
office, and other parts of the crematory business. A crematory must comply
with all applicable public health and environmental laws and rules and must
contain the equipment and meet all of the standards established by the rules
adopted by the Board.
(12) "Crematory licensee" means the Crematory licensee. – The individual or legal
entity that is licensed by the Board holds a license to operate a crematory and
perform cremations.
(13) "Crematory manager" means the Crematory manager. – The person who is
responsible for the daily management and operation of the crematory. A
crematory manager must either be licensed to practice funeral directing or
funeral service and be qualified as a crematory technician or must obtain a
Page 2 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

crematory manager permit issued by the Board. In order to receive a crematory
manager permit, a person must:must meet all of the following criteria:
a. Be at least 18 years of age.
b. Be of good moral character.
c. Be qualified as a crematory technician.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a crematory that is licensed by
the Board prior to January 1, 2004, and as of that date is not managed by a
crematory manager who is licensed to practice funeral directing or funeral
service, or who has a crematory manager permit, may continue to be managed
by a crematory manager who is not licensed to practice funeral directing or
funeral service or who does not have a crematory manager permit so long as
there is no sale, transfer, devise, gift, or any other disposal of a controlling
interest in the crematory.
(13a) "Cremation society" means any Cremation society. – Any person, firm,
corporation, or organization that is affiliated with a crematory licensed under
this Article and provides cremation information to consumers.
(14) "Crematory technician" means any Crematory technician. – Any employee of
a crematory licensee who has a certificate confirming that the crematory
technician has attended a training course approved by the Board. The Board
shall recognize the cremation certificate program that is conducted by the
Cremation Association of North America (CANA).
(15) "Final disposition" means the Final disposition. – The cremation and the
ultimate interment, entombment, inurnment, or scattering of the cremated
remains or the return of the cremated remains by the crematory licensee to the
authorizing agent or such agent's designee as provided in this Article. Upon
the written direction of the authorizing agent, cremated remains may take
various forms.
(16) "Holding and processing facility" means an Holding and processing facility.
– An area or areas that are designated for the retention of human remains prior
to, and the retention and processing of cremated remains after, cremation; that
comply with all applicable public health and environmental laws; preserve the
health and safety of the crematory technician and other personnel of the
crematory; and that are secure from access by anyone other than authorized
persons. A holding facility and processing facility must be located in a
crematory.
(17) "Human remains" means the Human remains. – The body of a deceased
person, including a separate human fetus, regardless of the length of gestation,
or body parts.
(17a) Hydrolysis container. – A container, other than a casket, designed to enclose
human remains and made of suitable material to be easily destroyed during
hydrolysis and to resist spillage and leakage. A hydrolysis container may be a
cremation container or any other container that meets the requirements of this
subdivision.
(17b) Hydrolysis licensee. – A person or entity licensed to hydrolyze human remains
and perform hydrolysis.
(17c) "Initial container" means a Initial container. – A receptacle for cremated
remains, for which the intended use and design is to hold cremated remains,
usually composed of cardboard, plastic, or similar material that can be closed
in a manner so as to prevent the leakage or spillage of the cremated remains
or the entrance of foreign material and is a single container of sufficient size
to hold the cremated remains.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 3

(17d) Liquid waste. – Any liquid remaining after hydrolysis that does not contain
any trace elements of human tissue.
(18) "Niche" means a Niche. – A compartment or cubicle for the memorialization
or final disposition of an urn or container containing cremated remains.
(19) "Processing" means the Processing. – The removal of bone fragments from
the cremation chamber for the reduction in size, labeling and packaging, and
placing in an urn or initial container.
(20) "Pulverization" means the Pulverization. – The reduction of identifiable or
unidentifiable bone fragments after the completion of the cremation to
granulated particles by mechanical means.
(20a) Reduced human remains. – The remains of a human body after completion of
reduction.
(20b) Reduction. – Alkaline hydrolysis, cremation, and any other method of final
disposition of human remains authorized pursuant to this Article.
(20c) Reduction container. – A container, including a cremation container or any
other container that meets the requirements of this subdivision other than a
casket, designed to enclose human remains and made of suitable material to
be easily destroyed during alkaline hydrolysis or cremation and to resist
spillage and leakage.
(21) "Scattering area" means an Scattering area. – An area permitted by North
Carolina law including, but not limited to, an an area designated by a cemetery
and located on dedicated cemetery property where cremated remains that have
been removed from their container can be mixed with or placed on top of the
soil or ground cover.
(22) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-531, s. 18, effective August 31, 2007.
(23) "Urn" means a Urn. – A receptacle designed to permanently encase the
cremated remains."
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 90-210.122 (Crematory Authority established.) is repealed.
SECTION 1.3. Section 1.2 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2025. The
members appointed to the Crematory Authority shall serve out their respective terms until
October 1, 2025, at which point, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the members'
respective terms will expire. Members shall be eligible for per diem and necessary travel and
subsistence expenses in accordance with G.S. 93B-5 for any eligible expenses incurred up to
October 1, 2025. The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service shall ensure that any unpaid,
eligible expenses pursuant to G.S. 90-210.122(d) shall be paid to members of the Crematory
Authority accordingly.
SECTION 1.4. G.S. 90-210.123 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.123. Licensing and inspection.
(a) Any person doing business in this State, or any cemetery, funeral establishment,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, voluntary organization, or any other entity may erect,
maintain, and operate a crematory in this State and may provide the necessary employees,
facilities, structure, and equipment for the cremation of human remains, provided that the person
or entity has secured a license as a crematory licensee in accordance with this Article.
(a1) A crematory operating under this Article is required to have a crematory manager. A
crematory manager may manage multiple crematories within a 50-mile radius of each other. A
crematory may operate for a period not to exceed 30 days without a crematory manager due to
the crematory manager's termination or cessation of employment if all of the following criteria
are met:
(1) The crematory manager was the only person employed that is eligible to serve
as a crematory manager at the time of the crematory manager's end of
employment.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(2) The crematory licensee retains one or more crematory technicians to perform
cremations.
(3) The crematory licensee registers the name of the crematory technicians with
the Board.
(b) A crematory may be constructed on or adjacent to any cemetery, on or adjacent to any
funeral establishment that is zoned commercial or industrial, or at any other location consistent
with local zoning and environmental regulations.
(c) Application for a license as a crematory licensee shall be made on forms furnished
and prescribed by the Board. The Board shall inspect the premises, facilities, structure, and
equipment to be used as a crematory, confirm that the crematory manager's and crematory
technician's educational certificate is valid, and issue a renewable license to the crematory
licensee if the applicant meets all the requirements and standards of the Board and the
requirements of this Article.
(c1) All applicants for licensure shall consent to a criminal history record check. Refusal
to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute grounds for the Board to deny
licensure to an applicant. The Board shall ensure that the State and national criminal history is
checked for any applicant applying for initial licensure or for reinstatement of licensure, if such
licensure has been expired for three or more years. The Department of Public Safety may provide
a criminal history record check to the Board for a person who has applied for a new or renewed
license under this Article; provided, however, that the Board and the applicant may consent to
the use of a criminal background check vendor other than the Department of Public Safety, the
cost of which shall be paid by the applicant. If the Department of Public Safety performs the
criminal background check, the Board shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along
with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information required by the
Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the
criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by
the State or national repositories. The applicant's fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State
Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's criminal history record file, and the State
Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Board shall keep all information pursuant
to this subsection privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and
the information shall be confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes. The Board, its officers and employees, acting in good faith and in compliance
with this section, shall be immune from civil liability for denying licensure to an applicant based
on information provided in the applicant's criminal history record check.
The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks
of criminal history records authorized by this subsection.
(d) Every application for licensure shall identify the crematory manager and all crematory
technicians employed by the crematory licensee providing that nothing in this Article shall
prohibit the designation and identification by the crematory licensee of one individual to serve
as a crematory manager and crematory technician. Each crematory licensed in North Carolina
shall employ on a full-time basis at least one crematory technician. Every application for
licensure and renewal thereof shall include all each crematory technicians' technician's
educational certificates. certificate. The crematory licensee shall keep the Board informed at all
times of the names and addresses of the crematory manager and all crematory technicians. In the
event a licensee is in the process of replacing its only crematory technician at the time of license
renewal, the licensee may continue to operate the crematory for a reasonable time period not to
exceed 180 30 days.
(d1) Crematory licensees that offer at-need cremation goods and services to the public
shall comply with the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984),
as amended.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 5

(e) All licenses and permits shall expire on the last day of December of each year. On or
after After February 1, a license or permit may be renewed by paying a late fee as provided in
G.S. 90-210.132 in addition to the annual renewal fee. Licenses and permits that remain expired
six months or more require a new application for renewal. Licenses and permits are not
transferable.
(e1) A new application for a license or permit shall be made to the Board within 30 days
following a change of ownership of more than fifty percent (50%) of the business. A new
application for a license or permit is required if any of the following occur:
(1) A change to the legal structure of a crematory that results in a change of a
majority of the crematory licensee's owners, partners, managers, members,
operators, or officers.
(2) A crematory licensee's owner, partner, manager, member, operator, or officer
that holds a majority of the crematory's ownership interest dies. The estate of
the decedent is permitted to apply for a permit within 180 days of the date of
death.
(f) No person, cemetery, funeral establishment, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
voluntary organization, or any other entity shall cremate any human remains, except in a
crematory licensed for this express purpose and operated by a crematory licensee subject to the
restrictions and limitations of this Article or unless otherwise permitted by statute.
(g) Whenever the Board finds that an owner, partner, crematory manager, member,
officer, or any crematory technician of a crematory licensee or any applicant to become a
crematory licensee, or that any authorized employee, agent, or representative has violated any
provision of this Article, or is guilty of any of the following acts, and when the Board also finds
that the crematory operator or applicant has thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may
suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license, in accordance with Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes:
(1) Conviction of a felony or a crime involving fraud or moral turpitude.plea of
guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor that indicates that the
individual is unfit or incompetent to engage in cremations or that the
individual has deceived or defrauded the public.
(1a) Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business license by
another jurisdiction.
(2) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a license, in the practice
of cremation, or in the operation of a licensee's business.
(3) False or misleading advertising.
(4) Solicitation of dead human bodies by the licensee, his agents, assistants, or
employees; but this subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit general
advertising by the licensee.
(5) Employment directly or indirectly of any agent, assistant, or other person on
a part-time or full-time basis or on commission for the purpose of calling upon
individuals or institutions by whose influence dead human bodies may be
turned over to a particular licensee.
(6) The direct or indirect payment or offer of payment of a commission by the
licensee or the licensee's agent, assistant, or employees for the purpose of
securing business.
(7) Gross immorality, including being under the influence of alcohol or drugs
while performing cremation services.Acts or omissions indicating that the
licensee is unable to engage in cremations with reasonable skill and safety by
reason of illness, excessive use of alcohol, drugs, chemicals, or any other type
of substance, or by reason of any physical or mental abnormality.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(8) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to perform services under this Article,
including the use of a picture or name in connection with advertisements or
other written material published or caused to be published by the licensee.
(9) Failing to treat a dead human body with respect at all times.
(10) Violating or cooperating with others to violate any of the provisions of this
Article Article, Article 13A, 13D, or 13E of this Chapter, or of the rules of the
Board or violation of Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as
amended.
(11) Violation of any State law or municipal or county ordinance or regulation
affecting the handling, custody, care, or transportation of dead human bodies.
(12) Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body or cremated
remains upon the express order of the person lawfully entitled to the custody
thereof, except as provided in G.S. 90-210.131(e).
(13) Indecent exposure or exhibition of a dead human body while in the custody or
control of a licensee.
(14) Practicing funeral directing, embalming, or funeral service without a license.
(15) Allowing anyone other than a licensee of the Board or a crematory technician
to perform a cremation.
(16) Failure to refund any insurance proceeds received as consideration in excess
of the funeral contract purchase price within 30 days of receipt.
(17) Failure to provide, within a reasonable time, either the goods and services
contracted for or a refund for the price of goods and services paid for but not
fulfilled.
(18) Violation of G.S. 58-58-97.
(19) Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or time
regarding any matter affecting the individual's performance of cremations.
(20) Failure to adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary licensed or unlicensed
staff, employees, agents, or contractors, as required by this Article and Article
13D, 13E, or 13F of this Chapter, any rules of the Board, or the standards set
forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as amended.
(21) Knowingly failing to follow the lawful direction of a person with the right to
authorize disposition of human remains in accordance with G.S. 130A-420.
In any case in which the Board is authorized to take any of the actions permitted under this
subsection, the Board may instead accept an offer in compromise of the charges whereby the
accused shall pay to the Board a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(h) Where the Board finds a licensee is guilty of one or more of the acts or omissions
listed in subsection (g) of this section but it is determined by the Board that the licensee has not
thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may place the licensee on a term of probation in
accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In any case in
which the Board is entitled to place a licensee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose
a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. The
Board may determine the length and conditions of any period of probation, suspension,
revocation, or refusal to issue or renew a license.
(i) The Board may hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of this Article and
Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The Board is empowered to regulate and
inspect crematories and crematory licensees and to enforce as provided by law the provisions of
this Article and the rules adopted hereunder. Any crematory that, upon inspection, is found not
to meet any of the requirements of this Article shall pay a reinspection fee to the Board for each
additional inspection that is made to ascertain whether the deficiency or other violation has been
corrected. The Board may obtain preliminary and final injunctions whenever a violation of this
Article has occurred or threatens to occur. The Board may enforce compliance with the standards
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 7

set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as amended, and in accordance
with subsection (d1) of this section.
(i1) The Board may apply for injunctive relief in the superior court of (i) the county where
an act is alleged to have taken place, (ii) the county where the defendant resides, or (iii) Wake
County, if any person, firm, corporation, or other entity has committed an act allegedly violating
any provision of this Article. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a defendant has acted in
violation of this Article, then the court shall issue an order enjoining and restraining the acts
constituting violations. The Board shall be entitled to reimbursement of costs and attorneys' fees
expended in an action brought under this subsection.
In addition to the powers enumerated in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Board
shall have the power to administer oaths and issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of persons
and the production of papers and records before the Board in any hearing, investigation, or
proceeding conducted by it. Members of the Board's staff or the sheriff or other appropriate
official of any county of this State shall serve all notices, subpoenas, and other papers given to
them by the President of the Board for service in the same manner as process issued by any court
of record. Any person who neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the Board shall be
guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.5. G.S. 90-210.124 (Authorizing agent.) is repealed.
SECTION 1.6. Article 13F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-210.124A. Authorizing agent.
All crematory licensees shall comply with G.S. 130A-420 when acting under their respective
scope of practice for dispositions of reduced human remains or body parts."
SECTION 1.7. G.S. 90-210.125 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.125. Authorization to cremate.
(a) A crematory licensee shall not cremate human remains until it has received a
cremation authorization form signed by an authorizing agent. The cremation authorization form
shall be prescribed by the Board and shall contain at a minimum the following information:
…
(6) A representation that the authorizing agent does in fact have the right to
authorize the cremation of the decedent and that the authorizing agent is not
aware of any living person who has a superior priority right to that of the
authorizing agent, as set forth in G.S. 90-210.124. G.S. 130A-420. Or, in the
event that there is another living person who does have a superior priority right
to that of the authorizing agent, a representation that the authorizing agent has
made all reasonable efforts to contact such person, has been unable to do so,
and has no reason to believe that such person would object to the cremation
of the decedent.
(7) A representation that the authorizing agent has either disclosed the location of
all living persons with an equal right to that of the authorizing agent, as set
forth in G.S. 90-210.124, G.S. 130A-420, or does not know the location of
any other living person with an equal right to that of the authorizing agent.
…
(13) If a cremation authorization form is being executed on a preneed basis, the
cremation authorization form shall contain the disclosure required by
G.S. 90-210.126. The authorizing agent may specify in writing religious
practices that conflict with Article 13 Article 13A, 13D, or 13F of this
Chapter. The crematory licensee and funeral director shall observe those
religious practices except where they interfere with cremation in a licensed
crematory as specified under G.S. 90-210.123 or the required documentation
and record keeping.
Page 8 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

…."
SECTION 1.8. G.S. 90-210.126 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.126. Preneed cremation arrangements.
(a) Any person, on a preneed basis, may authorize the person's own cremation and the
final disposition of the person's cremated remains by executing, as the authorizing agent, a
cremation authorization form on a preneed basis and having the form signed by two witnesses.
The witnesses in accordance with G.S. 130A-420. If the person executes a cremation
authorization form on a preneed basis, the person shall retain a copy of this form, and a copy
shall be sent to the funeral establishment and/or or the crematory licensee. licensee, or both. Any
person shall have the right to transfer or cancel this authorization at any time prior to the person's
death by destroying the executed cremation authorization form and providing written notice to
the party or parties that received the cremation authorization form.
…."
SECTION 1.9. G.S. 90-210.127 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.127. Record keeping.
(a) The crematory licensee shall furnish to the person who delivers such human remains
to the crematory licensee a receipt, signed by both the crematory licensee and the person who
delivers the human remains, showing the date and time of the delivery; the type of casket or
cremation container that was delivered; the name of the person from whom the human remains
were received and the name of the funeral establishment or other entity with whom such person
is affiliated; the name of the person who received the human remains on behalf of the crematory
licensee; and the name of the decedent. The crematory licensee shall retain a copy of this receipt
in its permanent records for three years.
(b) Upon its release of cremated reduced human remains, the crematory licensee shall
furnish to the person who receives such cremated those reduced human remains from the
crematory licensee a receipt, signed by both the crematory licensee and the person who receives
the cremated reduced human remains, showing the date and time of the release; the name of the
person to whom the cremated reduced human remains were released and the name of the funeral
establishment, cemetery, or other entity with whom such person is affiliated; the name of the
person who released the cremated reduced human remains on behalf of the crematory licensee;
and the name of the decedent. The crematory shall retain a copy of this receipt in its permanent
records for three years.
(c) A crematory licensee shall maintain at its place of business a record of all forms
required by the Board of each cremation that took place at its facility for three years. A funeral
establishment shall maintain at its place of business a record of all forms generated by or provided
to it under this Article for a period of three years.
(d) The crematory licensee shall maintain a record for three years of all cremated reduced
human remains disposed of by the crematory licensee in accordance with G.S. 90-210.126(d).
(e) Upon completion of the cremation, the crematory licensee shall issue a certificate of
cremation.
(f) All records that are required to be maintained under this Article shall be subject to
inspection by the Board or its agents upon request."
SECTION 1.10. G.S. 90-210.128 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.128. Cremation containers.
(a) No crematory licensee shall make or enforce any rules requiring that any human
remains be placed in a casket before cremation or that human remains be cremated in a casket,
nor shall any crematory licensee refuse to accept human remains for cremation for the reason
that they are not in a casket.
(b) No crematory licensee shall make or enforce any rules requiring that any cremated
remains be placed in an urn or receptacle designed to permanently encase the cremated reduced
human remains after the cremation process has been performed."
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 9

SECTION 1.11. G.S. 90-210.129 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.129. Cremation procedures.
(a) For any death occurring in North Carolina certified by the attending physician or other
person authorized by law to sign a death certificate under the supervision of a physician, the body
shall not be cremated before the crematory licensee receives a death certificate signed by the
person authorized to sign the death certificate, which shall contain contain, at a minimum
minimum, all of the following information:
(1) Decedent's name;name.
(2) Date of death;death.
(3) Date of birth;birth.
(4) Sex;Sex.
(5) Place of death;death.
(6) Facility name (if not institution, give street and number);number).
(7) County of death;death.
(8) City of death; anddeath.
(9) Time of death (if known).
…
(g) Human remains shall be cremated only while enclosed in a cremation container. Upon
completion of the cremation, and insofar as is possible, all of the recoverable residue of the
cremation process shall be removed from the cremation chamber. Insofar as is possible, all
residue of the cremation process shall then be separated from any foreign residue or anything
else other than bone fragments and then be processed by pulverization so as to reduce the
cremated remains to unidentifiable particles. Any foreign residue and anything other than the
particles of the cremated remains shall be removed from the cremated reduced human remains
as far as possible and shall be disposed of by the crematory licensee. This section does not apply
where law otherwise provides for commingling of human remains. The fact that there is
incidental and unavoidable residue in the cremation chamber used in a prior cremation is not a
violation of this subsection.
…
(k) Nothing in this Article shall require a crematory licensee to perform a cremation that
is impossible or impractical to perform.
(l) The cremated reduced human remains with proper identification shall be placed in an
initial container or the urn selected or provided by the authorizing agent. The initial container or
urn contents shall not be contaminated with any other object, unless specific authorization has
been received from the authorizing agent or as provided in subsection (g) of this section.
(m) If the cremated reduced human remains are greater than the dimensions of an initial
container or urn, the excess cremated reduced human remains shall be returned to the authorizing
agent or its representative in a separate container or urn.
(n) If the cremated reduced human remains are to be shipped, the initial container or urn
shall be packed securely in a suitable shipping container that complies with the requirements of
the shipper. Cremated Reduced human remains shall be shipped only by a method which has an
internal tracing system available and which provides a receipt signed by the person accepting
delivery, unless otherwise authorized in writing by the authorizing agent. Cremated Reduced
human remains shall be shipped to the proper address as stated on the cremation authorization
form signed by the authorizing agent.
…
(r) A crematory shall refrigerate human remains at a temperature not greater than 40
degrees Fahrenheit, unless the cremation will begin within 24 hours of the time in which the
crematory licensee takes custody of the human remains."
SECTION 1.12. G.S. 90-210.130 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.130. Final disposition of cremated reduced human remains.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(a) The authorizing agent shall provide the person with whom cremation arrangements
are made with a signed statement specifying the ultimate disposition of the cremated reduced
human remains, if known. The crematory licensee may store or retain cremated reduced human
remains as directed by the authorizing agent. Records of retention and disposition of cremated
reduced human remains shall be kept by the crematory licensee pursuant to G.S. 90-210.127.
(b) The authorizing agent is responsible for the disposition of the cremated reduced
human remains. If, after a period of 30 days from the date of cremation, If the authorizing agent
or the agent's representative has not specified the final disposition or claimed the cremated
remains, reduced human remains within 30 days after the crematory licensee provides written
notice delivered by certified mail to the authorizing agent's last known address that the reduced
human remains are available for retrieval, the crematory licensee or the person in possession of
the cremated reduced human remains may release the cremated reduced human remains to
another family member upon written notification to the authorizing agent delivered by certified
mail or dispose of the cremated reduced human remains only in a manner permitted in this
section. Article. The authorizing agent shall be responsible for reimbursing the crematory
licensee for all reasonable expenses incurred in disposing of the cremated reduced human
remains pursuant to this section. A record of such disposition shall be made and kept by the
person making the disposition. Upon disposing of cremated reduced human remains in
accordance with this section, Article, the crematory licensee or person in possession of the
cremated reduced human remains shall be discharged from any legal obligation or liability
concerning such cremated those reduced human remains.
(c) In addition to the disposal of cremated reduced human remains in a crypt, niche,
grave, or scattering garden located in a dedicated cemetery, or by scattering over uninhabited
public land, the sea, or other public waterways pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, cremated
reduced human remains may be disposed of in any manner on the private property of a consenting
owner, upon direction of the authorizing agent. If cremated reduced human remains are to be
disposed of by the crematory licensee on private property, other than dedicated cemetery
property, the authorizing agent shall provide the crematory licensee with the written consent of
the property owner.
(d) Except with the express written permission of the authorizing agent, no person
may:shall do any of the following:
(1) Dispose of or scatter cremated reduced human remains in such a manner or in
such a location that the cremated reduced human remains are commingled
with those of another person. This subdivision shall not apply to the scattering
of cremated reduced human remains at sea or by air from individual closed
containers or to the scattering of cremated remains in an area located in a
dedicated cemetery and used exclusively for such those purposes.
(2) Place cremated reduced human remains of more than one person in the same
closed container. This subdivision shall not apply to placing the cremated
reduced human remains of members of the same family in a common closed
container designed for the cremated reduced human remains of more than one
person with the written consent of the family.
(e) Cremated Reduced human remains shall be released by the crematory licensee to the
individual specified by the authorizing agent on the cremation authorization form. The
representative of the crematory licensee and the individual receiving the cremated reduced human
remains shall sign a receipt indicating the name of the deceased, and the date, time, and place of
the receipt, and contain a representation that the handling of the final disposition will be in a
proper manner. After this delivery, the cremated remains may be transported in any manner in
this State, without a permit, and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this Article.
(f) Cremated Reduced human remains may be scattered over uninhabited public land,
over a public waterway or sea, subject to health and environmental standards, or on the private
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 11

property of a consenting owner pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. A person may utilize a
boat or airplane to perform such scattering. Cremated scattering under this subsection. Reduced
human remains shall be removed from their closed container before they are scattered."
SECTION 1.13. G.S. 90-210.131 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.131. Limitation of liability.
…
(c) A crematory licensee shall not be responsible or liable for any valuables delivered to
the crematory licensee with human remains.
(d) A crematory licensee shall not be liable for refusing to accept a body or to perform a
cremation until it receives a court order or other suitable confirmation that a dispute has been
settled if:if any of the following are satisfied:
(1) It is aware of any dispute concerning the cremation of human remains;human
remains.
(2) It has a reasonable basis for questioning any of the representations made by
the authorizing agent; oragent.
(3) For any other lawful reason.
(e) If a crematory licensee is aware of any dispute concerning the release or disposition
of the cremated reduced human remains, the crematory licensee may refuse to release the
cremated reduced human remains until the dispute has been resolved or the crematory licensee
has been provided with a court order authorizing the release or disposition of the cremated
reduced human remains. A crematory licensee shall not be liable for refusing to release or dispose
of cremated reduced human remains in accordance with this subsection. A crematory licensee
may charge a reasonable storage fee if the dispute is not resolved within 30 days after it is
received by the crematory licensee."
SECTION 1.14. G.S. 90-210.132 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.132. Fees.
(a) By rule, the Board may set and collect fees from crematory and hydrolysis licensees,
crematory and hydrolysis manager permit holders, and applicants not to exceed the following
amounts:
(1) Licensee application fee. ............................................................ $400.00
(2) Annual renewal fee. ..................................................................... 150.00
(3) Late renewal fee. ............................................................................ 75.00
(4) Reinspection fee. .......................................................................... 150.00
(5) Per cremation or hydrolysis reduction fee. .................................... 10.00
(6) Late fee, per cremation or hydrolysis.reduction............................. 10.00
(7) Late fee, cremation or hydrolysis reduction report. ...... 75.00 per month
(8) Crematory or hydrolysis manager permit application fee. ........... 150.00
(9) Annual crematory or hydrolysis manager permit renewal fee. ..... 40.00.
(b) The funds collected pursuant to this Article shall become part of the general fund of
the Board.
(c) No later than the tenth day of each month, every crematory licensee and hydrolysis
licensee under this Article shall remit to the Board the per cremation or reduction fees for the
cremations or reductions which the crematory licensee performed during the immediately
preceding calendar month. Each remittance shall be accompanied by a statement signed by an
authorized representative of the licensee containing all of the following information:
(1) The name of the crematory licensee.
(2) Each decedent's name.
(3) Date of each cremation or reduction.
(4) The person or entity from whom each cremation or reduction was performed.
(5) The number of cremations or reductions contained in the statement.
(6) The total amount of fees remitted with the statement."
Page 12 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

SECTION 1.15. G.S. 90-210.136, as amended by this act, reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.136. Hydrolysis of human remains.
(a) The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Recodified as G.S. 90-210.121(1).
(2) Recodified as G.S. 90-210.121(17a).
(3) Recodified as G.S. 90-210.121(17b).
(4) Recodified as G.S. 90-210.121(17d).
(b) No person, cemetery, funeral establishment, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
voluntary organization, or other entity shall hydrolyze human remains without first obtaining a
license from the Board. Only funeral establishments holding a valid establishment permit
pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d) shall be eligible to be a hydrolysis licensee. An application for a
license under this subsection shall be made on forms furnished and prescribed by the Board.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a license for the hydrolysis of human
remains shall have the same requirements and comply with all provisions of this Article,
including G.S. 90-210.127 and G.S. 90-210.130, and be subject to the same fees as for the
licensing of crematories under this Article. The hydrolysis of human remains shall be conducted
in compliance with all requirements for cremation, and the licensee shall pay the same fees for
monthly reports for each hydrolysis as crematories under this Article.
(c1) Alkaline hydrolysis shall not be performed except on the physical premises of a
funeral establishment holding a valid establishment permit pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d).
…."
SECTION 1.16. G.S. 130A-415(j) reads as rewritten:
"(j) Any funeral director or funeral service licensee doing business within the State having
physical possession of a dead body shall make reasonable efforts to contact relatives of the
deceased or other persons who may wish to claim the body for final disposition. If the body
remains unclaimed for final disposition for 10 days, or if the right to authorize the type, method,
place, and disposition, of the dead body is waived under G.S. 130A-420(b1) or
G.S. 90-210.124(b), G.S. 130A-420(b1), and if all persons who have expressed interest in
arranging for the disposition for the dead body have ceased communication with the person in
possession of the dead body for five days, the dead body shall be deemed abandoned. If the
funeral director or funeral service licensee receives the dead body from a person or entity listed
in subsection (a) of this section, the 10-day period shall run concurrently with any period imposed
on that person or entity. Any person having possession of an abandoned dead body shall notify
the Commission of Anatomy. Upon request of the Commission of Anatomy, the person having
possession of the abandoned dead body shall deliver the abandoned dead body to the Commission
of Anatomy at a time and place specified by the Commission of Anatomy or shall permit the
Commission of Anatomy to take and remove the abandoned dead body."
SECTION 1.17. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART II. FUNERAL TRANSPORTATION AGREEMENTS/INSURANCE
SECTION 2.1.(a) G.S. 90-210.60 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.60. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:
…
(5) "Preneed funeral contract" means any contract, agreement, or mutual
understanding, or any series or combination of contracts, agreements, or
mutual understandings, whether funded by trust deposits or prearrangement
insurance policies, or any combination thereof, which has for a purpose the
furnishing or performance of funeral services, or the furnishing or delivery of
personal property, merchandise, or services of any nature in connection with
the final disposition of a dead human body, to be furnished or delivered at a
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 13

time determinable by the death of the person whose body is to be disposed of,
but does not mean the furnishing of a cemetery lot, crypt, niche, or
mausoleum;mausoleum. This term does not include a transportation
protection agreement.
…
(10) "Transportation protection agreement" means an agreement, sold separately
from a preneed funeral contract, that primarily provides for the coordination
and arranging of all professional services related to the preparation of human
remains or cremated remains for the purpose of initial and subsequent
transportation of those remains."
SECTION 2.1.(b) G.S. 90-210.72 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.72. Nonapplication to certain funeral contracts.
This Article does not apply to contracts any of the following:
(1) Contracts for funeral services or merchandise sold as preneed burial insurance
policies pursuant to Part 13 of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the North
Carolina General Statutes or to replacements policies pursuant to Article 13E
of this Chapter.
(2) Replacements or conversions of such policies pursuant to G.S.
143B-472.28.G.S. 90-210.106.
(3) A transportation protection agreement as defined in this Article."
SECTION 2.1.(c) The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service may adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.1.(d) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
preneed funeral contracts and transportation protection agreements entered into on or after that
date.
SECTION 2.2.(a) G.S. 58-7-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-7-15. Kinds of insurance authorized.
The kinds of insurance that may be authorized in this State, subject to the other provisions of
Articles 1 through 64 of this Chapter, are set forth in this section. Except to the extent an insurer
participates in a risk sharing plan under Article 42 of this Chapter, nothing in this section requires
any insurer to insure every kind of risk that it is authorized to insure. Except to the extent an
insurer participates in a risk sharing plan under Article 42 of this Chapter, no insurer may transact
any other business than that specified in its charter and articles of association or incorporation.
The power to do any kind of insurance against loss of or damage to property includes the power
to insure all lawful interests in the property and to insure against loss of use and occupancy and
rents and profits resulting therefrom; but no kind of insurance includes life insurance or insurance
against legal liability for personal injury or death unless specified in this section. In addition to
any power to engage in any other kind of business than an insurance business that is specifically
conferred by the provisions of Articles 1 through 64 of this Chapter, any insurer authorized to do
business in this State may engage in such other kinds of business to the extent necessarily or
properly incidental to the kinds of insurance business that it is authorized to do in this State. Each
of the following indicates the scope of the kind of insurance business specified:
(1) "Life insurance", meaning every insurance upon the lives of human beings
and every insurance appertaining thereto. The business of life insurance
includes the granting of endowment benefits; additional benefits in the event
of death by accident or accidental means; additional benefits operating to
safeguard the contract from lapse, or to provide a special surrender value, in
the event of total and permanent disability of the insured, including industrial
sick benefit; and optional modes of settlement of proceeds. The business of
life insurance does not include the provision of transportation protection
agreements, as defined under G.S. 90-210.60.
Page 14 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

…."
SECTION 2.2.(b) G.S. 58-58-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-58-1. Definitions; requisites of contract.
(a) All corporations or associations doing business in this State, under any charter or
statute of this or any other state, involving the payment of money or other thing of value to
families or representatives of policy and certificate holders or members, conditioned upon the
continuance or cessation of human life, or involving an insurance, guaranty, contract, or pledge
for the payment of endowments or annuities, or who employ agents to solicit such business, are
life insurance companies, in all respects subject to the laws herein made and provided for the
government of life insurance companies, and shall not make any such insurance, guaranty,
contract, or pledge in this State with any citizen, or resident thereof, which does not distinctly
state the amount of benefits payable, the manner of payment, the consideration therefor and such
other provisions as the Commissioner may require.
(b) This section does not apply to a preneed licensee under Article 13D of Chapter 90 of
the General Statutes or for the purposes of a transportation protection agreement, as defined under
G.S. 90-210.60."
SECTION 2.2.(c) G.S. 58-58-125 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-58-125. Minimum premium rates for assessment life insurance companies.
No assessment life insurance corporation, organization or association of any kind issuing
policies or contracts upon the life of any resident of this State shall hereafter be organized or
licensed by the Commissioner unless such corporation, organization or association adopt
premium rates based upon the attained age of the assured at the time of issuance of the contract
and such rates shall not be less than those fixed by the American Experience Table of Mortality
or any other recognized table of mortality approved by the Commissioner. Nothing contained in
this section shall be construed to affect burial associations regulated under G.S. 143B-472
through 143B-472.28 Article 13E of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or railroad burial
associations."
SECTION 2.2.(d) G.S. 58-58-330(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) This Part does not apply to solicitations or sales involving:involving any of the
following:
…
(7) Contracts used to fund:fund any of the following:
…
f. Prearranged funeral contracts.contracts or transportation protection
agreements, as both terms are defined under G.S. 90-210.60."
SECTION 2.2.(e) G.S. 58-58-335(8) reads as rewritten:
"(8) "Life insurance" means insurance coverage on human lives, including benefits
of endowment and annuities, and may include benefits in the event of death
or dismemberment by accident and benefits for disability income; and unless
otherwise specifically excluded, includes individually issued annuities. In
accordance with G.S. 58-7-15, this term does not include a transportation
protection agreement."
SECTION 2.2.(f) G.S. 58-60-35(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-60-35. Disclosure of prearrangement insurance policy provisions.
(a) As used The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Prearrangement" means any Prearrangement. – A contract, agreement, or
mutual understanding, or any series or combination of contracts, agreements
or mutual understandings, whether funded by trust deposits or prearrangement
insurance policies, or any combination thereof, which has for a purpose the
furnishing or performance of specific funeral services, or the furnishing or
delivery of specific personal property, merchandise, or services of any nature
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 15

in connection with the final disposition of a dead human body, to be furnished
or delivered at a time determinable by the death of the person whose body is
to be disposed of, but does not mean the furnishing of a cemetery lot, crypt,
niche, mausoleum, grave marker or monument. This term does not include a
transportation protection agreement, as defined under G.S. 90-210.60.
(2) "Prearrangement insurance policy" means a Prearrangement insurance policy.
– A life insurance policy, annuity contract, or other insurance contract, or any
series of contracts or agreements in any form or manner, issued on a group or
individual basis by an insurance company authorized by law to do business in
this State, which, whether by assignment or otherwise, has for its sole purpose
the funding of a specific preneed funeral contract or a specific
insurance-funded funeral or burial prearrangement, the insured being the
person for whose service the funds were paid."
SECTION 2.2.(g) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
preneed funeral contracts and transportation protection agreements entered into on or after that
date.
SECTION 2.3.(a) G.S. 58-58-97 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-58-97. Provision of life insurance information upon notification of insured's death.to
funeral provider.
(a) Any person licensed to practice funeral directing or any employee of a funeral
establishment licensed under the provisions of Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes
providing funeral service, as that term is defined in G.S. 90-210.20, for may request from a life
insurance carrier information regarding a life insurance contract or contracts as follows:
(1) For a prospective policy beneficiary when that beneficiary is requesting the
use of a life insurance policy for the fulfilment of funeral services, by
providing the insurer a written authorization from the prospective policy
beneficiary.
(2) For a deceased person insured or believed to be insured under a contract of
life insurance or under a group life insurance policy may request information
regarding the deceased person's life insurance contracts policy, by providing
an insurer with (i) a copy of a notification of death filed pursuant to
G.S. 130A-112, (ii) written authorization from the person or persons with
legal authority to direct disposition of the deceased's body as prescribed under
G.S. 90-210.124 or G.S. 130A-420, and (iii) in the case of a person covered
or believed to be covered under a group life insurance policy, the affiliation
of the deceased entitling them to coverage under the group life insurance
policy.
(a1) As soon as possible No later than one business day after receipt of the request, a
request under this section, the life insurance company shall inform the person authorized by this
section to make an inquiry of the following:following information:
(1) The existence of any contract insuring the life of the deceased person.
(2) Any beneficiaries on record under any life insurance contract insuring the life
of a prospective policy beneficiary or the deceased person.
(3) The amount of any liens or loans outstanding on the policy.
(4) The amount of benefits payable to the beneficiaries.
(5) Whether the policy has been reinstated within the last 24 months.
The insurer shall provide a claim form to any person or assignee making the request.
(b) If any person making a written request under subsection (a) of this section who has
provided all the information required by subsection (a) of this section does not receive a timely
response within one business day from the insurer, then the person may refer the request to the
Consumer Services Division of the Department, which shall treat the referral as a consumer
Page 16 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

complaint. The referral shall include all the information provided to the insurer under subsection
(a) of this section as well as copies of all communications and information received from the
insurer regarding the request for information. Failure to meet the deadline for the provision of
information under this section may subject the insurer to a penalty under G.S. 58-2-70.
(c) If In the case of a deceased person, if the beneficiary of record under the life insurance
contract or group life insurance policy is not the estate of the deceased, then any person
authorized to request information under subsection (a) of this section shall make reasonable
efforts to locate the beneficiaries within 100 hours of receiving information from the insurance
carrier regarding any life insurance contracts or group life insurance policies and shall provide
to all beneficiaries all documents and information obtained from the insurance carrier. The person
obtaining the information also shall inform all beneficiaries in writing in bold print that "THE
BENEFICIARY OF A LIFE INSURANCE POLICY HAS NO LEGAL DUTY OR
OBLIGATION TO SPEND ANY OF THAT MONEY ON THE FUNERAL, DEBTS, OR
OBLIGATIONS OF THE DECEASED" and shall do so before discussing with the beneficiaries
financial arrangements for burial of the deceased.
…."
SECTION 2.3.(b) G.S. 58-39-75(4a) reads as rewritten:
"(4a) To a person making an inquiry authorized under G.S. 58-58-97 when
providing funeral service to a deceased insured; G.S. 58-58-97; or"
SECTION 2.3.(c) This section is effective 30 days after it becomes law and applies
to inquiries made to life insurance carriers doing business in this State on or after that date.
SECTION 2.4. Except as otherwise provided, this Part is effective when it becomes
law.
PART III. PRACTICE OF FUNERAL SERVICE/BOARD CHANGES
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 90-210.18A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.18A. Board of Funeral Service created; qualifications; vacancies; removal.
(a) The General Assembly declares that the practice of funeral service affects the public
health, safety, and welfare and is subject to regulation and control in the public interest. The
public interest requires that only qualified persons be permitted to practice funeral service in
North Carolina and that the profession merit the confidence of the public. This Article shall be
liberally construed to accomplish these ends.
(b) The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service is created and shall regulate the practice
of funeral service in this State. The Board shall have nine members as follows:
(1) Four Three members appointed by the Governor from nominees
recommended by the North Carolina Funeral Directors Association, Inc.
These members shall be persons licensed under this Article.
(2) Two Three members appointed by the Governor from nominees
recommended by the Funeral Directors & Morticians Association of North
Carolina, Inc. These members shall be persons licensed under this Article.
(3) One member appointed by the Governor who is licensed under this Article
and who is not affiliated with any funeral service trade association.
(4) One member appointed by the General Assembly, upon the recommendation
of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. This member shall be a person
who is not licensed under this Article or employed by a person who is licensed
under this Article.
(5) One member appointed by the General Assembly, upon the recommendation
of the Speaker of the House of Representatives. This member shall be a person
who is not licensed under this Article or employed by a person who is licensed
under this Article.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 17

Members of the Board shall serve staggered three-year terms, ending on December 31 of the
last year of the term or when a successor has been duly appointed, whichever is later. No member
may serve more than two complete consecutive terms.
…."
SECTION 3.2.(a) The following provisions are recodified as follows:
Former Citation Recodified Citation
90-210.20(a) 90-210.20(1)
90-210.20(b) 90-210.20(3)
90-210.20(c) 90-210.20(5)
90-210.20(c1) 90-210.20(6)
90-210.20(c2) 90-210.20(7)
90-210.20(d) 90-210.20(8)
90-210.20(e) 90-210.20(9)
90-210.20(e2) 90-210.20(11)
90-210.20(f) 90-210.20(12)
90-210.20(g) 90-210.20(13)
90-210.20(h) 90-210.20(14)
90-210.20(i) 90-210.20(16)
90-210.20(j) 90-210.20(17)
90-210.20(k) 90-210.20(18)
90-210.20(l) 90-210.20(20)
SECTION 3.2.(b) G.S. 90-210.20, as amended by subsection (a) of this section,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.20. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions apply to this
Article and Articles 13D and 13F of this Chapter:
(1) "Advertisement" means the Advertisement. ‒ The publication, dissemination,
circulation or placing before the public, or causing directly or indirectly to be
made, published, disseminated or placed before the public, any announcement
or statement in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of
a book, notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, poster, bill, sign, placard,
card, label or tag, or over any radio, television station, or electronic medium.
(2) Alkaline hydrolysis. ‒ The technical process that reduces dead human bodies
to bone fragments using heat, water, and chemical agents.
(3) "Board" means the Board. ‒ The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service.
(4) Branch establishment. ‒ A funeral establishment that serves as an ancillary
facility to a principal funeral establishment, which is not required to contain a
preparation room pursuant to G.S. 90-210.27A(a).
(5) "Burial" includes interment Burial. ‒ Interment in any form, cremation and
the transportation of the dead human body as necessary therefor.necessary.
(6) "Chapel" means a chapel or other Chapel. ‒ A facility separate from the
funeral establishment premises for the primary purpose of reposing of dead
human bodies, visitation or visitation, funeral ceremony ceremony, or
memorial service that is owned, operated, or maintained by a principal funeral
establishment under this Article, and that does not use the word "funeral" in
its name, on a sign, in a directory, in advertising or in any other manner; is not
staffed on a full-time basis, in which or on the premises of which which, there
is not displayed any caskets or other funeral merchandise; in which or on the
premises of which there is not located any business office or preparation room;
and which no owner, operator, employee, or agent thereof represents the
chapel to be a funeral establishment. A funeral establishment may utilize a
Page 18 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

chapel to make funeral arrangements and to sell funeral merchandise to the
public by photograph or digital presentation, and to make financial
arrangements related to the sale, provided that such uses are secondary and
incidental to and do not interfere with the reposing of dead human bodies,
visitation, funeral ceremony, or memorial service.
(7) "Dead human bodies", as used in this Article Dead human bodies. ‒ The body
of a decedent, regardless of its stage of decomposition, and includes fetuses
beyond the second trimester and the ashes from cremated bodies.ashes, bone
fragments, or human materials produced as a result of cremation or alkaline
hydrolysis.
(8) "Embalmer" means any Embalmer. ‒ Any person engaged in the practice of
embalming.
(9) "Embalming" means the Embalming. ‒ The preservation and disinfection or
attempted preservation and disinfection of dead human bodies by application
of chemicals externally or internally or both and the practice of restorative art
including the restoration or attempted restoration of the appearance of a dead
human body. Embalming shall not include the washing or use of soap and
water to cleanse or prepare a dead human body for disposition by the
authorized agents, family, or friends of the deceased who do so privately
without pay or as part of the ritual washing and preparation of dead human
bodies prescribed by religious practices; provided, that no dead human body
shall be handled in a manner inconsistent with G.S. 130A-395.
(10) Embalming facility. ‒ A facility, other than a funeral establishment, at which
an embalmer or funeral service licensee engages in embalming and in which,
or on the premises of which, there is not displayed any caskets or other funeral
merchandise, and which no owner, operator, employee, or agent represents
the embalming facility to be a funeral establishment or engages in funeral
directing.
(11) "Entry-level examination in funeral directing" means an Entry-level
examination in funeral directing. ‒ An examination (i) offered as a component
of a final or capstone course in a mortuary science program approved by the
Board or (ii) accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education
or an examination equivalent to the State Board Examination-Arts in Funeral
Directing recognized by rule adopted by the Board to assess competency in
the following subjects:
a. Funeral arranging and directing.
b. Funeral service marketing and merchandising.
c. Funeral service counseling.
d. Legal and regulatory compliance.
e. Cemetery and crematory Crematory operations.
(12) "Funeral directing" means engaging Funeral directing. ‒ Engaging in the
practice of funeral service except embalming.
(13) "Funeral director" means any Funeral director. ‒ Any person engaged in the
practice of funeral directing.
(14) "Funeral establishment" means every Funeral establishment. ‒ Every place or
premises devoted to or used in the care, arrangement and preparation for the
funeral and final disposition of dead human bodies and maintained for the
convenience of the public in connection with dead human bodies or as the
place for carrying on the practice of funeral service.
(15) Funeral merchandise or funeral supplies. ‒ Any personal property used in
connection with the conduct of funerals or with the transportation and final
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 19

disposition of a dead human body, including caskets, outer burial containers,
cremation caskets, urns, and burial clothing. The term does not mean
mausoleum crypts, pre-installed outer burial containers or interment
receptacles, and columbarium niches or other services or merchandise at a
cemetery regulated by the Cemetery Commission.
(16) "Funeral service licensee" means a Funeral service licensee. ‒ A person who
is duly licensed and engaged in the practice of funeral service.
(17) "Funeral service" means the Funeral service. ‒ The aggregate of all funeral
service licensees and their duties and responsibilities in connection with the
funeral as an organized, purposeful, time-limited, flexible, group-centered
response to death.
(18) "Practice of funeral service" means engaging Practice of funeral service. ‒
Engaging in the care or disposition of dead human bodies or in the practice of
disinfecting and preparing by embalming or otherwise dead human bodies for
the funeral service, transportation, burial or burial, cremation, or other lawful
means of final disposition, or in the practice of funeral directing or embalming
as presently known, whether under these titles or designations or otherwise.
"Practice of funeral service" also means engaging in making arrangements for
funeral service, selling funeral supplies to the public or making financial
arrangements for the rendering of such services or the sale of such supplies.
(19) Principal funeral establishment. ‒ The funeral establishment that serves as the
primary or principal business office of a funeral establishment that has been
issued a license by the Board to operate a branch funeral establishment or
chapel.
(20) "Resident trainee" means a Resident trainee. ‒ A person who is engaged in
preparing to become licensed for the practice of funeral directing, embalming
or funeral service under the personal supervision and instruction of a person
duly licensed for the practice of funeral directing, embalming or funeral
service in the State of North Carolina under the provisions of this Chapter, and
who is duly registered as a resident trainee with the Board."
SECTION 3.3. G.S. 90-210.23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.23. Powers and duties of the Board.
…
(d) Every person licensed by the Board and every resident trainee shall furnish all
information required by the Board reasonably relevant to the practice of the profession or
business for which the person is a licensee or resident trainee. Every funeral service establishment
and its records and every place of business where the practice of funeral service or embalming is
carried on and its records shall be subject to inspection by the Board during normal hours of
operation and periods shortly before or after normal hours of operation and shall furnish all
information required by the Board reasonably relevant to the business therein conducted. Every
licensee, permit holder, resident trainee, embalming facility, and funeral service establishment
establishment, crematory, and alkaline hydrolysis licensee shall provide the Board with a current
post-office address which shall be placed on the appropriate register and all notices required by
law or by any rule or regulation of the Board to be mailed to any licensee, permit holder, resident
trainee, embalming facility, or funeral service establishment establishment, crematory, or
alkaline hydrolysis licensee shall be validly given when mailed to the address so provided.
(d1) The Board is empowered to hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of this
Article and of Chapter 150B to subpoena witnesses and to administer oaths to or receive the
affirmation of witnesses before the Board.
In any show cause hearing before the Board held under the authority of Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes where the Board imposes discipline against a licensee, the Board may recover
Page 20 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

the costs, other than attorneys' fees, of attorneys' fees and costs associated with holding the
hearing against all respondents jointly, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500).five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(e) The Board is empowered to regulate and inspect, according to law, funeral service
establishments and establishments, embalming facilities, chapels, crematories, and alkaline
hydrolysis licensees, their operation, and the licenses under which they are operated, and to
enforce as provided by law the rules, regulations, and requirements of the Division of Health
Services and of the city, town, or county in which the funeral service establishment or
establishment, embalming facility facility, chapel, crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis licensee is
maintained and operated. Any funeral establishment or embalming facility establishment,
embalming facility, chapel, crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis licensee that, upon inspection, is
found not to meet all of the requirements of this Article shall pay a reinspection fee to the Board
Board, as set by rule adopted by the Board, for each additional inspection that is made to ascertain
that the deficiency or other violation has been corrected. The Board is also empowered to enforce
compliance with the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. 453 (1984), as
amended from time to time.
…."
SECTION 3.4. G.S. 90-210.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.24. Inspector.
(a) The Board may appoint one or more agents who shall serve at the pleasure of the
Board and who shall have the title "Inspector of the North Carolina Board of Funeral Service."
No person is eligible for appointment as inspector unless at the time of the appointment the person
is licensed under this Article as a funeral service licensee.
(b) To determine compliance with the provisions of this Article Articles 13A, 13D, and
13F of this Chapter and regulations promulgated rules adopted by the Board under this Article,
inspectors may do any of the following:
(1) Enter the office, establishment office or place of business of any funeral
service licensee, funeral director or embalmer in North Carolina, and any
office, establishment funeral establishment, embalming facility, chapel,
crematory, or alkaline hydrolysis facility, removal and transportation
business, or place in North Carolina where the practice of funeral service or
embalming is carried on, or where that practice is advertised as being carried
on, or where a funeral visitation, funeral, or memorial service is being
conducted or a body is being embalmed, to inspect the records, office,
establishment, or facility, or to inspect the practice being carried on or license
or registration of any licensee licensee, permit holder, and any resident trainee
operating therein;there.
(2) Enter any hospital, nursing home, or other institution from which a dead
human body has been removed by any person licensed under this Article or
their designated representative to inspect records pertaining to the removal
and its authorization; andauthorization.
(3) May inspect criminal and probation records of licensees and applicants for
licenses under this Article to obtain evidence of their character.
Inspectors may serve papers and subpoenas issued by the Board or any office or member thereof
under authority of this Article, and shall perform other duties prescribed or ordered by the Board.
(c) Upon request by the Board, the Attorney General of North Carolina shall provide the
inspectors with appropriate identification cards, signed by the Attorney General or his designated
agent.
(d) The Board may prescribe an inspection form to be used by the inspectors in
performing their duties."
SECTION 3.5. G.S. 90-210.25 reads as rewritten:
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 21

"§ 90-210.25. Licensing.
(a) Qualifications, Examinations, Resident Traineeship and Licensure. –
(1) To be licensed for the practice of funeral directing under this Article, an
applicant for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of
the Board that the applicant:
a. Is at least 18 years of age.
b. Is of good moral character.
c. Possesses a degree in mortuary science or has graduated from a
Funeral Director Program, or the equivalent, from a program approved
by the Board or accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service
Education.
d. Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident
traineeship as a funeral director, pursuant to the procedures and
conditions set out in G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), either before or after
satisfying the educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this
subdivision.
e. Within the last three five years, has obtained passing scores on all of
the following examinations:
1. Entry-level examination in funeral directing.
2. Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 5.
3. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set
forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984),
pursuant to its most recent version, and rules of the Board and
other agencies dealing with the care, transportation and
disposition of dead human bodies.
4. Examination of pathology.
f. Has paid all applicable fees.
(2) To be licensed for the practice of embalming under this Article, an applicant
for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of the Board
that the applicant:
a. Is at least 18 years of age.
b. Is of good moral character.
c. Possesses an associate degree in mortuary science, or the equivalent,
from a mortuary science program approved by the Board and
accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education.
d. Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident
traineeship as an embalmer pursuant to the procedures and conditions
set out in G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), either before or after satisfying the
educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this subdivision.
e. Within the past three five years, has passed an oral or written
embalmer examination on the following subjects:
1. Embalming, restorative arts, chemistry, pathology,
microbiology, and anatomy.
2. Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 6.
3. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set
forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984),
pursuant to its most recent version, and rules of the Board and
other agencies dealing with the care, transportation and
disposition of dead human bodies.
f. Has paid all applicable fees.
Page 22 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(3) To be licensed for the practice of funeral service under this Article, an
applicant for licensure bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of
the Board that the applicant:
a. Is at least 18 years of age.
b. Is of good moral character.
c. Possesses an associate degree in mortuary science, or the equivalent,
from a mortuary science program approved by the Board and
accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education.
d. Within the last three years, has completed 12 months of resident
traineeship as a funeral service licensee, pursuant to the procedures
and conditions set out in G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4), either before or after
satisfying the educational requirement under sub-subdivision c. of this
subdivision.
e. Within the last three five years, has passed an oral or written funeral
service examination on the following subjects:
1. Entry-level examination in funeral directing.
2. Embalming, restorative arts, chemistry, pathology,
microbiology, and anatomy.
3. Repealed by Session Laws 1997-399, s. 7.
4. Examination of the laws of North Carolina, the standards set
forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984),
pursuant to its most recent version, and rules of the Board and
other agencies dealing with the care, transportation and
disposition of dead human bodies.
A funeral service examination taken and passed on or before October 1,
2018, for the purposes of attaining licensure under this section shall be
considered valid for a five-year period following the date on which the
applicant passed the examination.
f. Has paid all applicable fees.
(3a) To be licensed provisionally for the practice of funeral directing under this
Article, an applicant bears the burden of substantiating to the satisfaction of
the Board that the applicant:
a. Has completed a Board-approved application for a provisional license
and paid an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00).
b. Is at least 18 years of age.
c. Is of good moral character.
d. Possesses an undergraduate degree in any field, an Associate of
Applied Science degree in any field, or a diploma in funeral directing
from a Board-approved curriculum at an accredited college of
mortuary science.
e. Has a certified resident traineeship, is eligible for certification as a
resident trainee, or has at least five years of professional experience
under the supervision of a licensed funeral director.director or funeral
service licensee.
A provisional license issued pursuant to this subsection shall expire on
December 31 of each year and shall not be renewed more than two times. The
annual renewal fee for a provisional license issued pursuant to this subsection
is two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). A provisional licensee shall complete
a minimum of five hours of continuing education each year, which may
include up to two hours of online instruction.year in accordance with
G.S. 90-210.25(a)(5)d.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 23

If, within three years of first obtaining a provisional license, the
provisional licensee substantiates to the satisfaction of the Board that the
provisional licensee has obtained passing scores on an examination of the laws
of North Carolina, the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16
C.F.R. § 453 (1984), pursuant to its most recent version, and rules of the Board
and other agencies dealing with the care, transportation, and disposition of
dead human bodies, and a Board-approved entry-level examination in funeral
directing, the Board may issue the provisional licensee a funeral director
license subject to the same annual renewal requirements as for licensees in
funeral directing.
(4)a. A person desiring to become a resident trainee shall apply to the Board on a
form provided by the Board. The application shall state that the applicant is
not less than 18 years of age, of good moral character, and is the graduate of
a high school or the equivalent thereof, and shall indicate the licensee under
whom the applicant expects to train. A person training to become an embalmer
may serve under the supervision of either a licensed embalmer or a funeral
service licensee who is in good standing with the Board and who has practiced
been licensed to practice funeral service or embalming full time for a
minimum of five years. one year. A person training to become a funeral
director may serve under the supervision of either a licensed funeral director
or a funeral service licensee who is in good standing with the Board and who
has practiced been licensed to practice funeral service or funeral directing full
time for a minimum of five years. one year. A person training to become a
funeral service licensee shall serve under the supervision of a funeral service
licensee who is in good standing with the Board and who has practiced been
licensed to practice funeral service full time for a minimum of five years. one
year. The application must be sustained by oath of the applicant and be
accompanied by the appropriate fee. When the Board is satisfied as to the
qualifications of an applicant it shall instruct the secretary to issue a certificate
of resident traineeship.register the applicant as a resident trainee.
b. Within 30 days of a resident trainee leaving the proctorship of the
licensee under whom the trainee has worked, the licensee shall file
with the Board an affidavit affidavits showing the length of time
served with the licensee by the trainee, and the affidavit trainee and
attesting to the trainee's competencies on a form prescribed by the
Board by rule. The affidavits shall be made a matter of record in the
Board's office. The licensee shall deliver a copy copies of the affidavit
affidavits to the trainee.
c. A person who has not completed the traineeship and wishes to do so
under the supervision of a licensee other than the one whose name
appears on the original certificate with whom he or she initially
registered may reapply to the Board for approval.
d. A certificate of resident traineeship shall be signed by the resident
trainee and upon Upon payment of the renewal fee fee, registration of
a resident traineeship shall be renewable for one year after the date of
original registration; but the certificate registration may not be
renewed more than two times. The Board shall mail to each registered
trainee at the trainee's last known residential address or e-mail address
a notice that the renewal fee is due and that, if not paid within 30 days
of the notice, the certificate registration will be canceled. A late fee, in
addition to the renewal fee, shall be charged for a late renewal, except
Page 24 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

that the renewal of the registration of any resident trainee who is
engaged in active service in the Armed Forces of the United States
shall not be charged a late fee. No credit shall be allowed for the
12-month period of resident traineeship that shall have been completed
more than five years preceding the examination for a license.
However, any resident trainee to whom G.S. 105-249.2 grants an
extension of time to file a tax return shall be allowed an extension of
time to retain credit equal to the number of days of active deployment.
e. All registered resident trainees shall electronically report to the Board
at least once every month during traineeship upon forms provided by
the Board listing the work which has been completed during the
preceding month of resident traineeship. The Board may set and
collect a late fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each work
report filed after the date the report is due. The data contained in the
reports shall be certified as correct by the licensee under whom the
trainee has served during the period and by the licensed person who is
managing the funeral service establishment. Each report shall list the
following:
1. For funeral director trainees, the conduct of any funerals during
the relevant time period,
2. For embalming trainees, the embalming of any bodies during
the relevant time period,
3. For funeral service trainees, both of the activities named in 1
and 2 of this subsection, engaged in during the relevant time
period.
f. To meet the resident traineeship requirements of G.S. 90-210.25(a)(1),
G.S. 90-210.25(a)(2) and G.S. 90-210.25(a)(3) the following must be
shown by the affidavit(s) of the licensee(s) under whom the trainee
worked:
1. That the funeral director trainee has, under the supervision of
the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's supervisor,
substantially assisted in directing at least 25 funerals during the
resident traineeship,
2. That the embalmer trainee has, under the supervision of the
licensed individual, registered as the trainee's supervisor,
substantially assisted in embalming at least 25 bodies during
the resident traineeship,
3. That the funeral service trainee has, under the supervision of
the licensed individual, registered as the trainee's supervisor,
substantially assisted in directing at least 25 funerals and,
under the supervision of the licensed individual, registered as
the trainee's supervisor, substantially assisted in embalming at
least 25 bodies during the resident traineeship.
g. The Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a
certificate of registration of a resident traineeship for violation of any
provision of this Article or place a trainee on probation for any
violation of this Article or rules adopted by the Board. The Board may
determine the length of any suspension, revocation, refusal to issue or
renew, or probation and impose conditions on probation and
reinstatement as the Board deems appropriate.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 25

h. Each registered supervisor for a resident trainee must during the period
of sponsorship be actively employed with a funeral establishment. The
traineeship shall be a primary vocation of the trainee.
i. Only one two resident trainee trainees may register and serve at any
one time under any one person licensed and registered as a resident
trainee supervisor under this Article.
j., k. Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 528, s. 4.
l. Any resident trainee or registered supervisor of a resident trainee shall
meet with the Board upon request.
m. A 12-month resident traineeship that is completed on or before
October 1, 2018, shall be recognized as a qualifying traineeship for
licensure under this section for the five-year period following the
completion date of the traineeship.
(5) The Board by regulation may recognize other examinations that the Board
deems equivalent to its own. After an applicant fails to obtain a passing score
on an examination two consecutive times, the applicant must wait at least 60
days to retake the examination.
a. All licenses shall be signed by the president and secretary of the Board
and the seal of the Board affixed thereto. All licenses shall be issued,
renewed or duplicated for a period not exceeding one year upon
payment of the renewal fee, and all licenses, renewals or duplicates
thereof shall expire and terminate the thirty-first day of December
following the date of their issue unless sooner revoked and canceled;
provided, that the date of expiration may be changed by unanimous
consent of the Board and upon 90 days' written notice of such change
to all persons licensed for the practice of funeral directing, embalming
and funeral service in this State.
b. The holder of any license issued by the Board who shall fail to renew
the same on or before February 1 of the calendar year for which the
license is to be renewed shall have forfeited and surrendered the
license as of that date. No license forfeited or surrendered pursuant to
the preceding sentence shall be reinstated by the Board unless it is
shown to the Board that the that:
1. The applicant has, throughout the period of forfeiture, engaged
full time in another state of the United States or the District of
Columbia in the practice to which the applicant's North
Carolina license applies and has completed for each such year
continuing education substantially equivalent in the opinion of
the Board to that required of North Carolina licensees; or
2. The applicant has completed in North Carolina a total number
of hours of accredited continuing education computed by
multiplying five times the number of years of forfeiture; or has
passed the North Carolina examination for the forfeited
license.forfeiture.
No additional resident traineeship shall be required. The applicant
shall be required to pay all delinquent annual renewal fees incurred for
all years since expiration of licensure and a reinstatement fee. fee set
forth in G.S. 90-210.28. The Board may waive the provisions of this
section for an applicant for a forfeiture which occurred during the
applicant's service in the Armed Forces of the United States provided
Page 26 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

the applicant applies within six months following severance
therefrom.
c. All licensees now or hereafter licensed in North Carolina shall take
continuing education courses approved by the Board in subjects
relating to the practice of the profession for which they are licensed,
to the end that the benefits of learning and reviewing skills will be
utilized and applied to assure proper service to the public.
d. As a prerequisite to the annual renewal of a license, the licensee must
complete, during the year immediately preceding renewal, at least five
hours of continuing education courses, of which the Board may require
licensees to take up to two hours specified by the Board. All continuing
education courses must be approved by the Board prior to enrollment.
A licensee who completes more than five hours in a year may carry
over a maximum of five hours as a credit to the following year's
renewal requirement. A licensee does not have to satisfy the
continuing education requirement for the calendar year in which the
license was first obtained.
e. The Board shall not renew a license unless fulfillment of the
continuing education requirement has been certified to it on a form
provided by the Board, but the Board may waive this requirement for
renewal in cases of certified illness or undue hardship or where the
licensee lives outside of North Carolina and does not practice in North
Carolina, and the Carolina. The Board shall waive the continuing
education requirement for all licensees who the following licensees:
1. All licensees who were licensed on or before December 31,
2003, and have been licensed in North Carolina for a
continuous period of 25 years or more, for all more.
2. All licensees who are licensed on or after January 1, 2004, who
have been licensed for a continuous period of 25 years or more
and have attained the age of 60 years, and for all years.
3. All licensees who are, at the time of renewal, members of the
North Carolina General Assembly.
f. The Board shall cause to be established and offered to the licensees,
each calendar year, at least eight hours of Board-sponsored continuing
education courses. The Board may charge licensees attending these
courses a reasonable registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars
($50.00) in order to meet the expenses thereof and may also meet those
expenses from other funds received under the provisions of this
Article.
g. Any person who having been previously licensed by the Board as a
funeral director or embalmer prior to July 1, 1975, shall not be required
to satisfy the requirements herein for licensure as a funeral service
licensee, but shall be entitled to have such license renewed upon
making proper application therefor and upon payment of the renewal
fee provided by the provisions of this Article. Persons previously
licensed by the Board as a funeral director may engage in funeral
directing, and persons previously licensed by the Board as an
embalmer may engage in embalming. Any person having been
previously licensed by the Board as both a funeral director and an
embalmer may upon application therefor receive a license as a funeral
service licensee.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 27

h. All applicants for licensure, including any owner, partner, manager,
member, operator, or officer of a business entity applying for licensure
under this Article, shall consent to a criminal history record check.
Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute
grounds for the Board to deny licensure to an applicant. The Board
shall ensure that the State and national criminal history is checked for
any applicant applying for initial licensure or for reinstatement of
licensure, if such licensure has been expired for three or more years.
The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check
to the Board for a person who has applied for a new or renewal license,
or certification through the Board. The Board; provided, however, that
the Board and the applicant may consent to the use of a criminal
background check vendor other than the Department of Public Safety,
the cost of which shall be paid by the applicant. If the Department of
Public Safety performs the criminal background check, the Board shall
provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the
fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information required by
the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicant
consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the
fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or
national repositories. The applicant's fingerprints shall be forwarded
to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's criminal
history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward
a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
national criminal history check. The Board shall keep all information
pursuant to this subdivision privileged, in accordance with applicable
State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be
confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes. The Board, its officers and employees, acting in good
faith and in compliance with this section, shall be immune from civil
liability for denying licensure to an applicant based on information
provided in the applicant's criminal history record check.
The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for
conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this
subdivision.
(a1) Inactive Licenses. – Any person holding a license issued by the Board for funeral
directing, for embalming, or for the practice of funeral service service, or any registered resident
trainee may apply for an inactive license in the same category as the active license held. The
inactive license is renewable annually. Continuing education is not required for the renewal of
an inactive license. The holder of an inactive license may not engage in any activity requiring an
active license. The holder of an inactive license may apply for an active license in the same
category, and the Board shall issue an active license if the applicant has completed a total number
of hours of accredited continuing education equal to five times the number of years the applicant
held the inactive license. No application fee is required for the reinstatement of an active license
pursuant to this subsection. The holder of an inactive license who returns to active status shall
surrender the inactive license to the Board.
(a2) In order to engage in the practice of funeral directing or funeral service, such a
licensee must own, be employed by, or otherwise be an agent of a licensed funeral establishment;
except that such a licensee may practice funeral directing or funeral service if any of the following
apply:
(1) The licensee is employed by a college of mortuary science.
Page 28 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(2) The licensee does all of the following:
a. Maintains all of the licensee's business records at a location made
known to the Board and available for inspection by the Board under
the same terms and conditions as the business records of a licensed
funeral establishment.
b. Complies with rules and regulations imposed on funeral
establishments and the funeral profession that are designed to protect
consumers, to include, but not be limited to, the Federal Trade
Commission's laws and rules requiring General Price Lists and
Statements of Goods and Services.
c. Pays to the Board the funeral establishment license fee required by law
and set by the Board.
d. Obtains and maintains a professional liability insurance policy with
liability limits of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). Certificates
of professional liability insurance shall be (i) submitted to the Board
within 30 days of the initial registration of the licensee by the Board
and (ii) submitted to the Board upon request. The licensee shall notify
the Board in writing within 30 days of any change in the insurer or any
cancellation or suspension of policy.
e. Submits an affidavit to the Board attesting that he or she owns, or was
being employed by, a funeral establishment directly damaged or
destroyed by Hurricane Helene.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a licensee from arranging cremations and
cremating human remains while employed by a crematory.
(b) Persons Licensed under the Laws of Other Jurisdictions. –
(1) The Board shall grant licenses to funeral directors, embalmers and funeral
service licensees, licensed in other jurisdictions, when it is shown that the
applicant has satisfied all of the following:
a. The applicant holds an active, valid license in good standing as a
funeral director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee issued by a
jurisdiction that will reciprocate a North Carolina license to practice
as a funeral director, embalmer, or funeral service licensee. The
license, at the time it was issued by the other jurisdiction, must have
had equal or greater education, training, and examination
requirements.
b. The applicant has demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules
governing the profession in North Carolina through achieving a
passing score on the laws and rules exam administered on behalf of
the Board.
c. The applicant has submitted proof of the applicant's good moral
character.
d. The applicant has practiced in the profession for at least three
consecutive years in a jurisdiction that will reciprocate a North
Carolina license to practice as a funeral director, embalmer, or funeral
service licensee.
e. The applicant has paid all applicable fees.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude any individual from obtaining a
license by meeting the requirements of subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of
subsection (a) of this section.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 29

(1a) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Board shall grant
licenses to funeral directors licensed in other jurisdictions if the applicant has
satisfied all of the following:
a. The applicant holds an active, valid license in good standing as a
funeral director issued by the other jurisdiction for at least 10 years.
b. The applicant has demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules
governing the profession in North Carolina through achieving a
passing score on the law and rules exam administered on behalf of the
Board.
c. The applicant has submitted proof of the applicant's good moral
character.
Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude any individual from obtaining a
license by meeting the requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, or
subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 2018-78, s. 1, effective October 1, 2018.
(3) The Board may issue special permits, to be known as courtesy cards,
permitting nonresident funeral directors, embalmers and funeral service
licensees to remove bodies from and to arrange and direct funerals and
embalm bodies in this State, but these privileges shall not include the right to
establish a place of business in or engage generally in the business of funeral
directing and embalming in this State. Except for special permits issued by the
Board for teaching continuing education programs and for work in connection
with disasters, no special permits may be issued to nonresident funeral
directors, embalmers, and funeral service licensees from states that do not
issue similar courtesy cards to persons licensed in North Carolina pursuant to
this Article. The Board may adopt rules under this subsection to include
courtesy card application procedures and the limited practice of funeral
service that may be conducted with a courtesy card.
(c) Registration, Filing and Transportation. –
(1) The holder of any license granted by this State for those within the funeral
service profession or renewal thereof provided for in this Article shall cause
registration to be filed in the office of the board of health of the county or city
in which he practices his profession, or if there be no board of health in such
county or city, at the office of the clerk of the superior court of such county.
All such Except as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection, all licenses,
certificates, duplicates and renewals thereof shall be displayed in a
conspicuous place in the funeral establishment where the holder renders
service.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any railway agent, express agency, baggage master,
conductor or other person acting as such, to receive the dead body of any
person for shipment or transportation by railway or other public conveyance,
to a point outside of this State, unless the body is accompanied by a
burial-transit permit.
(3) The "transportation or removal of a dead human body" shall mean the removal
of a dead human body for a fee from the location of the place of death or
discovery of death or the transportation of the body to or from a medical
facility, funeral establishment or embalming facility, crematory or related
holding facility, crematory, place of final disposition, or place designated by
the Medical Examiner for examination or autopsy of the dead human body.
(4) Any individual, not otherwise exempt from this subsection, shall apply for and
receive a removal and transportation permit from the Board before engaging
Page 30 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

in the transportation or removal of a dead human body in this State. No person,
firm, or corporation shall conduct, maintain, manage, or operate a business
engaged in the transportation or removal of a dead human body unless a
removal and transportation permit for that business has been issued by the
Board and is conspicuously displayed in the removal vehicles of that business.
Unless otherwise exempt from this subsection, no corporation or other
business entity shall engage in the transportation or removal of a dead human
body unless it has in its employ at least one individual who holds a permit
issued under this section. No individual permit holder shall engage in the
transportation or removal of a dead human body for more than one person,
firm, or corporation without first providing the Board with written notification
of the name and physical address of each such employer.
(5) The following persons shall be exempt from the permit requirements of this
section but shall otherwise be subject to subdivision (9) of this subsection and
any rules relating to the proper handling, care, removal, or transportation of a
dead human body:
a. Licensees under this Article Articles 13A and 13F of this Chapter and
their employees.
b. Employees of common carriers.
c. Except as provided in sub-subdivision (6)c. of this section, employees
of the State and its agencies and employees of local governments and
their agencies.
d. Funeral directors directors, embalmers, or funeral service licensees
licensed in another state and their employees.
(6) The following persons shall be exempt from this section:
a. Emergency medical technicians, rescue squad workers, volunteer and
paid firemen, and law enforcement officers while acting within the
scope of their employment.
b. Employees of public or private hospitals, nursing homes, or long-term
care facilities, while handling a dead human body within such facility
or while acting within the scope of their employment.
c. State and county medical examiners and their investigators.
d. Any individual transporting cremated remains.
e. Any individual transporting or removing a dead human body of their
immediate family or next of kin.
f. Any individual who has exhibited special care and concern for the
decedent.
(7) Individuals eligible to receive a permit under this section for the transportation
or removal of a dead human body for a fee, shall:
a. Be at least 18 years of age.
b. Possess and maintain a valid drivers license issued by this State and
provide proof of all liability insurance required for the registration of
any vehicle in which the person intends to engage in the business of
the removal or transportation of a dead human body.
c. Affirmatively state under oath that the person has read and understands
the statutes and rules relating to the removal and transportation of dead
human bodies and any guidelines as may be adopted by the Board.
d. Provide three written character references on a form prescribed by the
Board, one of which must be from a licensed funeral director.
e. Be of good moral character.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 31

f. Obtain and maintain a professional liability insurance policy with
liability limits of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
Certificates of professional liability insurance shall be (i) submitted to
the Board within 30 days of the initial registration of the transporter
by the Board and (ii) submitted to the Board annually as a condition
for renewal of each transport permit. The transporter shall notify the
Board in writing within 30 days of any change in the insurer or any
cancellation or suspension of the policy. Individuals covered by an
employer's professional liability insurance policy shall provide
evidence satisfactory to the Board that the policy covers that individual
and meets the criteria provided in this sub-subdivision.
(8) The permit issued under this section shall expire on December 31 of each year.
The application fee for the individual permit shall not exceed one hundred
twenty-five dollars ($125.00). two hundred dollars ($200.00). The application
fee for the business permit shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00).
A fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), in addition to the annual
renewal fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00), shall be charged for
any application for renewal of a permit received by the Board after February
1 of each year.
(9) No person shall transport a dead human body in the open cargo area or
passenger area of a vehicle or in any vehicle in which the body may be viewed
by the public. Any person removing or transporting a dead human body shall
either cover the body, place it upon a stretcher designed for the purpose of
transporting humans or dead human bodies in a vehicle, and secure such
stretcher in the vehicle used for transportation, or shall enclose the body in a
casket or container designed for common carrier transportation, and secure the
casket or container in the vehicle used for transportation. No person shall fail
to treat a dead human body with respect at all times. No person shall take a
photograph or video recording of a dead human body without the consent of
a member of the deceased's immediate family or next of kin or other
authorizing agent.
(10) The Board may adopt rules under this section including permit application
procedures and the proper procedures for the removal, handling, and
transportation of dead human bodies. The Board shall consult with the Office
of the Chief Medical Examiner before initiating rule making under this section
and before adopting any rules pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section
prohibits the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner from adopting policies
and procedures regarding the removal, transportation, or handling of a dead
human body under the jurisdiction of that office that are more stringent than
the laws in this section or any rules adopted under this section.
(11) Each applicant for a permit shall provide the Board with the applicant's home
address, name and address of any corporation or business entity employing
such individual for the removal or transportation of dead human bodies, and
the make, year, model, and license plate number of any vehicle in which a
dead human body is transported. A permittee shall provide written notification
to the Board of any change in the information required to be provided to the
Board by this section or by the application for a permit within 30 days after
such change takes place.
(12) If any person shall engage in or hold himself out as engaging in the business
of transportation or removal of a dead human body without first having
Page 32 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

received a permit under this section, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor.
(13) The Board shall have the authority to inspect any place or premises that the
business of removing or transporting a dead human body is carried out and
shall also have the right of inspection of any vehicle and equipment used by a
permittee for the removal or transportation of a dead human body.
(14) The Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the permit, place
the permittee on a term of probation, or impose a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with a term of probation or in
lieu of other disciplinary action when it finds that any person permitted to
transport dead human bodies has engaged in any of the following acts:
a. Conviction of a felony or a crime involving fraud or moral
turpitude.of, or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony or
misdemeanor crime that indicates the permittee is unfit or incompetent
to engage in removal or transportation or that the permittee has
deceived or defrauded the public.
b. Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business
license by another jurisdiction.
c. Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a permit.
d. False or misleading advertising as the holder of a permit.
e. Solicitation of dead human bodies by the permittee or the permittee's
agents, assistants, or employees. However, this sub-subdivision shall
not be construed to prohibit general advertising.
f. Gross immorality, including being under the influence of alcohol or
drugs while handling or transporting dead human bodies.Acts or
omissions indicating that the permittee is unable to engage in removal
or transportation of dead human bodies with reasonable skill and
safety by reason of illness, excessive use of alcohol, drugs, chemicals,
or any other type, or by reason of any physical or mental abnormality.
g. Failing to treat a dead human body with respect at all times.
h. Violating or cooperating with others to violate any of the provisions
of this Article, any rules and regulations of the Board, or any State law
or municipal or county ordinance or regulation affecting the handling,
custody, care, or transport of dead human bodies.
i. Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body
upon the express order of the person lawfully entitled to custody of the
body.
j. Indecent exposure or exhibition of a dead human body while in a
permittee's custody or control.
k. Practicing Practice of funeral directing, funeral service, or embalming
without a license.
l. Acts or omissions that endanger public health.
m. Acts or omissions that deceive, defraud, or harm the public while
engaging in the removal or transportation of dead human bodies.
n. Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or
time regarding any matter relating to the permittee's engagement in the
removal or transportation of dead human bodies.
The Board shall have the authority to determine the length and conditions
of any period of revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew, or
probation.
(d) Funeral Establishment Permit. –
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 33

(1) No person, firm or corporation shall conduct, maintain, manage or operate a
funeral establishment unless a permit for that establishment has been issued
by the Board and is conspicuously displayed in the establishment. Each
funeral establishment at a specific location shall be deemed to be a separate
entity and shall require a separate permit and compliance with the
requirements of this Article. Each funeral establishment shall have in charge
a person, known as a manager, licensed for the practice of funeral directing or
funeral service, who shall be permitted to manage a principal funeral
establishment and any branch funeral establishments and chapels registered to
it within a 50-mile radius in a straight line. The manager shall be charged with
overseeing the daily operation of the funeral establishment and any branch
funeral establishments and chapels registered to the principal funeral
establishment. If the manager leaves the employment of the funeral
establishment and is the only licensee employed who is eligible to serve as
manager, the funeral establishment may operate without a manager for a
period not to exceed 30 days so long as: (i) the funeral establishment retains
one or more licensees to perform all services requiring a license under this
Article and (ii) the funeral establishment registers the name of the licensees
with the Board.
(2) A permit shall be issued when:
a. It is shown that the funeral establishment has in charge a person,
known as a manager, licensed for the practice of funeral directing or
funeral service, who shall not be permitted to manage more than one
funeral establishment. The manager shall be charged with overseeing
the daily operation of the funeral establishment. If the manager leaves
the employment of the funeral establishment and is the only licensee
employed who is eligible to serve as manager, the funeral
establishment may operate without a manager for a period not to
exceed 30 days so long as: (i) the funeral establishment retains one or
more licensees to perform all services requiring a license under this
Article; (ii) the licensees are not practicing under the exception
authorized by G.S. 90-210.25(a2) and would otherwise be eligible to
serve as manager; and (iii) the funeral establishment registers the name
of the licensees with the Board.a licensed manager as set forth in this
subsection.
b. The Board receives a list of the names of all part-time and full-time
licensees employed or contracted by the funeral establishment.
c. It is shown that the funeral establishment satisfies the requirements of
G.S. 90-210.27A.
d. The Board receives payment of the permit fee.
(3) Applications for funeral establishment permits shall be made on forms
provided by the Board and filed with the Board by the owner, a partner, a
member of the limited liability company, or an officer of the corporation
manager, or if operating within the 30 days allowed pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the owner, a partner, a member of the limited liability
company, or an officer of the corporation by January 1 of each year, and shall
be accompanied by the application fee or renewal fee, as the case may be. All
permits shall expire on December 31 of each year. If the renewal application
and renewal fee are not received in the Board's office on or before February
1, a late renewal fee, in addition to the regular renewal fee, shall be charged.
Page 34 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

Funeral establishment permits that remain expired six months or more cannot
be renewed.
(4) The Board may place on probation, refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or
revoke a permit when an owner, partner, manager, member, operator, or
officer of the funeral establishment violates any provision of this Article or
any regulations of the Board, or when any agent or employee of the funeral
establishment, with the consent of any person, firm or corporation operating
the funeral establishment, violates any of those provisions, rules or
regulations. In any case in which the Board is entitled to place a funeral
establishment permittee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose a
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with
the probation. In any case in which the Board is entitled to suspend, revoke,
or refuse to renew a permit, the Board may accept from the funeral
establishment permittee an offer to pay a penalty of not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000). The Board may either accept a penalty or revoke
or refuse to renew a license, but not both. Any penalty under this subdivision
may be in addition to any penalty assessed against one or more licensed
individuals employed by the funeral establishment. The Board shall have the
authority to determine the length and conditions of any period of revocation,
suspension, refusal to issue or renew, or probation.
(5) Funeral establishment permits are not transferable. A new application for a
permit shall be made to the Board within at least 30 days of prior to a change
of ownership of a funeral establishment. establishment occurring due to an
acquisition or sale. A change to the legal structure owning a funeral
establishment shall constitute a change of ownership only when there is a
change of a majority of the funeral establishment's owners, partners,
managers, members, operators, or officers. The death of an owner, partner,
manager, member, operator, or officer holding a majority of the funeral
establishment's ownership interests constitutes a change of ownership;
provided that the estate of the decedent shall be permitted to submit a new
application for a permit within 180 days following the majority owner's death.
For the purposes of this subdivision, a funeral establishment means one or
more structures on a contiguous piece of property.
(d1) Embalming Outside Establishment. Embalming Facilities. – An embalmer who
engages in embalming in a facility other than a funeral establishment or in the residence of the
deceased person shall, no later than January 1 of each year, at an embalming facility shall register
the facility with the Board on forms provided by the Board.
(e) Revocation; Suspension; Compromise; Disclosure. –
(1) Whenever the Board finds that an applicant for a license or a person to whom
a license has been issued by the Board is guilty of any of the following acts or
omissions and the Board also finds that the person has thereby become unfit
to practice, the Board may suspend or revoke the license or refuse to issue or
renew the license, in accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes:
a. Conviction of a felony or a crime involving fraud or moral
turpitude.of, or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony or
misdemeanor that indicates that the individual is unfit or incompetent
to engage in funeral service or that the individual has deceived or
defrauded the public.
a1. Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business
license by another jurisdiction.
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 35

b. Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a license or in the
practice of funeral service or operation of a licensee's business.
c. False or misleading advertising as the holder of a license.
d. Solicitation of dead human bodies by the licensee, his agents,
assistants, or employees; but this paragraph shall not be construed to
prohibit general advertising by the licensee.
e. Employment directly or indirectly of any resident trainee agent,
assistant or other person, on a part-time or full-time basis, or on
commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions
by whose influence dead human bodies may be turned over to a
particular licensee.
f. The payment or offer of payment of a commission by the licensee, his
agents, assistants or employees for the purpose of securing business
except as authorized by Article 13D of this Chapter.
g. Gross immorality, including being under the influence of alcohol or
drugs while practicing funeral service.Acts or omissions indicating
that the permittee is unable to engage in funeral service with
reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness, excessive use of
alcohol, drugs, chemicals, or any other type of substance, or by reason
of any physical or mental abnormality.
h. Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to perform services under this
Article, including the use of a picture or name in connection with
advertisements or other written material published or caused to be
published by the licensee.
i. Failing Failure to treat a dead human body with respect at all times.
j. Violating or cooperating Violation or cooperation with others to
violate any of the provisions of this Article or Articles 13D, 13E, or
13F of this Chapter, any rules and regulations of the Board, or the
standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. 453 (1984),
as amended from time to time.
k. Violation of any State law or municipal or county ordinance or
regulation affecting the handling, custody, care or transportation of
dead human bodies.
l. Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body or
cremated remains upon the express order of the person lawfully
entitled to the custody thereof.
m. Knowingly making any false statement on a certificate of death or
violating or cooperating with others to violate any provision of Article
4 or 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes or any rules or
regulations promulgated under those Articles as amended from time to
time.
n. Indecent exposure or exhibition of a dead human body while in the
custody or control of a licensee.
o. Failure to refund any insurance proceeds received as consideration in
excess of the funeral contract purchase price within 30 days of receipt;
provided, however, that this provision shall not be construed to include
interest or growth on funds paid toward funeral goods and services to
be provided pursuant to an inflation-proof preneed contract.
p. Failure to provide, within a reasonable time, either the goods and
services contracted for or a refund for the price of goods and services
paid for but not fulfilled.
Page 36 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

q. Violation of G.S. 58-58-97.
r. Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or
time regarding any matter affecting the individual's performance of
funeral services.
s. Failure to adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary licensed or
unlicensed staff, employees, agents, or contractors as required by this
Article or Articles 13D, 13E, or 13F of this Chapter, any rules and
regulations adopted by the Board, or the standards set forth in Funeral
Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. § 453 (1984), as amended.
t. Knowingly failing to follow the lawful direction of the person or
persons with the right to authorize disposition of a dead human body
in accordance with G.S. 130A-420.
In any case in which the Board is entitled to suspend, revoke or refuse to
renew a license, the Board may accept from the licensee an offer to pay a
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The Board may either
accept a penalty or revoke or refuse to renew a license, but not both.
(2) Where the Board finds that a licensee is guilty of one or more of the acts or
omissions listed in subdivision (e)(1) of this section but it is determined by the
Board that the licensee has not thereby become unfit to practice, the Board
may place the licensee on a term of probation in accordance with the
procedures set out in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In any case in
which the Board is entitled to place a licensee on a term of probation, the
Board may also impose a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. The Board may also require
satisfactory completion of remedial or educational training as a prerequisite to
license reinstatement or for completing the term of probation. The Board shall
have the authority to determine the length and conditions of any period of
suspension, revocation, probation, or refusal to issue or renew a license.
No person licensed under this Article shall remove or cause to be embalmed a dead human
body when he or she has information indicating crime or violence of any sort in connection with
the cause of death, nor shall a dead human body be cremated, until permission of the State or
county medical examiner has first been obtained. However, nothing in this Article shall be
construed to alter the duties and authority now vested in the office of the coroner.Office of the
Chief Medical Examiner.
No funeral establishment shall accept a dead human body from any public officer (excluding
the State or county medical examiner or his agent), examiner), or employee or from the official
of any institution, hospital or nursing home, or from a physician or any person having a
professional relationship with a decedent, without having first made due inquiry as to the desires
of the persons who have the legal authority to direct the disposition of the decedent's body. If any
persons are found, their authority and directions shall govern the disposal of the remains of the
decedent. decedent's body pursuant to G.S. 130A-420. Any funeral service establishment
receiving the remains in violation of this subsection shall make no charge for any service in
connection with the remains prior to delivery of the remains as stipulated by the persons having
legal authority to direct the disposition of the body. This section shall not prevent any funeral
service establishment from charging and being reimbursed for services rendered in connection
with the removal of the remains of any deceased person in case of accidental or violent death,
and rendering necessary professional services required until the persons having legal authority
to direct the disposition of the body have been notified.
When and where a licensee presents a selection of funeral merchandise to the public to be
used in connection with the service to be provided by the licensee or an a funeral establishment
as licensed under this Article, a card or brochure shall be directly associated with each item of
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 37

merchandise setting forth the price of the service using said merchandise and listing the services
and other merchandise included in the price, if any. When there are separate prices for the
merchandise and services, such cards or brochures shall indicate the price of the merchandise
and of the items separately priced.
At the time funeral arrangements are made and prior to the time of rendering the service and
providing the merchandise, a funeral director or funeral service licensee shall give or cause to be
given to the person or persons making such arrangements a written statement duly signed by a
licensee of said funeral establishment showing the price of the service as selected and what
services are included therein, the price of each of the supplemental items of services or
merchandise requested, and the amounts involved for each of the items for which the funeral
establishment will advance moneys as an accommodation to the person making arrangements,
insofar as any of the above items can be specified at that time. If fees charged by a finance
company for expediting payment of life insurance proceeds to the establishment will be passed
on to the person or persons responsible for payment of the funeral expenses, information
regarding the fees, including the total dollar amount of the fee, shall be disclosed in writing. The
statement shall have printed, typed or stamped on the face thereof: "This statement of disclosure
is provided under the requirements of North Carolina G.S. 90-210.25(e)." a disclosure indicating
that the statement is provided pursuant to the requirements of G.S. 90-210.25(e). The Board may
prescribe other disclosures that a licensee shall give to consumers upon finding that the disclosure
is necessary to protect public health, safety, and welfare.
(e1) The taking or recovery of human tissue at a funeral establishment facility licensed
pursuant to Article 13A or 13F of this Chapter by any person is prohibited. The prohibition does
not apply to any of the following:
(1) A licensee under this Article that performs embalming or otherwise prepares
a dead human body in the ordinary course of business.
(2) The Chief Medical Examiner or anyone acting under the Chief Medical
Examiner's authority.
(3) An autopsy technician who takes or recovers tissue from a dead human body
if all of the following apply:
a. The taking or recovery is the subject of an academic research program.
b. The academic research program has appropriate Institutional Review
Board supervision.
c. The academic research program has obtained informed consent of the
donor or the person legally authorized to provide consent.
No funeral establishment or person licensed under this Article No licensee under Article 13A
or 13F of this Chapter shall permit the taking or recovery of human tissue from a dead human
body in its custody or control for human transplantation purposes or for research purposes, except
that a funeral establishment or person licensed under this Article may permit an autopsy
technician to take or recover tissue at a funeral establishment pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection. No funeral establishment licensee under Article 13A or 13F of this Chapter or any of
its licensees, agents, or employees shall accept, solicit, or offer to accept any payment, gratuity,
commission, or compensation of any kind for referring potential tissue donors to a tissue bank or
tissue broker or to an eye bank or eye broker. For purposes of this subsection, the term "tissue"
does not include an eye.
(f) Unlawful Practices. – The following shall constitute unlawful practices:
(1) Any person who practices or holds himself or herself out as practicing the
profession or art of embalming, funeral directing or practice of funeral service
or operating a funeral establishment without having complied with the
provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who knowingly or willfully abuses or mutilates a dead human
body in a person's custody shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. It shall
Page 38 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

not be a violation of this subdivision for a person licensed to practice
embalming or funeral service under this Article to embalm a dead human body
consistent with techniques of embalming generally recognized by embalming
or funeral service licensees under this Article or for a person licensed to
practice funeral directing or funeral service to exhibit a dead human body
consistent with lawful instructions from the person authorized to dispose of
the dead human body.
(g) Whenever it shall appear to the Board that any person, firm or corporation has
violated, threatens to violate or is violating any provisions of this Article, the Board may apply
to the courts of the State for a restraining order and injunction to restrain these practices. If upon
application the court finds that any provision of this Article is being violated, or a violation is
threatened, the court shall issue an order restraining and enjoining the violations, and this relief
may be granted regardless of whether criminal prosecution is instituted under the provisions of
this subsection. The venue for actions brought under this subsection shall be the superior court
of (i) any county in which the acts are alleged to have been committed or in committed, (ii) the
county where the defendant in the action resides.resides, or (iii) Wake County. The Board shall
be entitled to reimbursement of costs and attorneys' fees expended from any defendant found to
have engaged in the unlicensed practice of funeral service by a court of this State."
SECTION 3.6. G.S. 90-210.25B reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25B. Persons who shall not be licensed under this Article.with criminal history.
(a) The board shall not issue or renew any licensure, permit, or registration to any person
or entity who has been convicted of a sexual offense against a minor.When considering an
application for license, permit, or registration, the Board may find that criminal conviction for
sexual offense against a minor is indicative of the applicant's lack of fitness to practice funeral
service.
…."
SECTION 3.7. G.S. 90-210.26 (Good moral character.) is repealed.
SECTION 3.8. G.S. 90-210.27A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.27A. Funeral establishments.
(a) Every funeral establishment shall contain a preparation room which is strictly private,
of suitable size for the embalming of dead bodies. Each preparation room shall:
(1) Contain one standard type operating table.
(2) Contain facilities for adequate drainage.
(3) Contain a sanitary waste receptacle.receptacles for the storage of waste and
soiled linens.
(4) Contain an instrument sterilizer.
(5) Have wall-to-wall floor covering of tile, concrete, or other material which can
be easily cleaned.
(6) Be kept in sanitary condition and subject to inspection by the Board or its
agents at all times.
(7) Have a placard or sign on the door indicating that the preparation room is
private.
(8) Have a proper ventilation or purification system to maintain a nonhazardous
level of airborne contamination.
(9) Contain surgical gloves and clean smocks or gowns for use when embalming
or otherwise preparing remains for disposition.
(10) Contain identification tags for use in accordance with G.S. 90-210.29A.
(a1) If a funeral establishment is damaged or destroyed by fire, weather event, or natural
disaster, the Board may suspend the requirements of subsections (a) and (c) of this section, in
part or whole, for a period not to exceed two years, provided that the funeral establishment
remains in compliance with the requirements of G.S. 90-210.25(a2)(2) and (d) and all other
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 39

applicable State laws, rules, and regulations of the town, municipality, or county where the
funeral establishment is located. To receive an extension of more than two years from the date
of loss, the funeral establishment may petition a court of competent jurisdiction who, upon
finding that granting the requested extension would not negatively affect the public health, safety,
and welfare, may grant an additional extension not to exceed three years from the date of loss or
one year from the date of the court's order, whichever is greater.If a funeral establishment is
destroyed by fire, weather event, or other natural disaster, the Board may suspend the
requirements of subsections (a) and (c) of this section, in part or whole, for a period not to exceed
two years. To receive an extension of more than two years from the date of loss, the funeral
establishment may petition a court of competent jurisdiction who, upon finding that granting the
requested extension would not negatively affect the public health, safety, and welfare, may grant
an additional extension not to exceed three years from the date of loss or one year from the date
of the court's order, whichever is greater. In addition to remaining in compliance with all
applicable State laws, rules, and regulations of the city or county where the funeral establishment
is located, a funeral establishment operating under a waiver or extension granted under this
section shall do all of the following:
(1) Comply with all rules and regulations imposed on funeral establishments and
the funeral profession designed to protect consumers, including the provisions
of G.S. 90-210.25(d) and the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices,
16 C.F.R. § 453, as amended.
(2) Maintain all of the licensee's business records at a location made known to the
Board and available for inspection by the Board under the same terms and
conditions as the business records of a funeral establishment.
…
(e) If a funeral establishment is solely owned by a natural person, that person must be
licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service licensee. If it is owned by a
partnership, at least one partner must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral
service licensee. If it is owned by a corporation, the president, vice-president, or the chairman of
the board of directors must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service
licensee. If it is owned by a limited liability company, at least one member must be licensed by
the Board as a funeral director or a funeral service licensee. The licensee required by this
subsection must be actively engaged in the operation of the funeral establishment. A provisional
license to practice funeral directing pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(a)(3a) shall be subject to the same
supervision requirements as a resident trainee pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(a)(4); provided,
however, that a provisional funeral director's license shall not qualify as a funeral director's
license for the purposes of this subsection, subsections (a2) and subsection (d) of G.S. 90-210.25,
or Article 13D of this Chapter.
(f) If a funeral establishment uses the name of a living person in the name under which
it does business, that person must be licensed by the Board as a funeral director or a funeral
service licensee.
(g) No funeral establishment shall own, operate, or maintain a branch funeral
establishment or chapel without first having registered the name, location, and ownership thereof
with the Board; own or maintain more than two chapels, or own or maintain a branch funeral
establishment or chapel outside of a radius of 50 miles in a straight line from the funeral
establishment. A duly licensed person may use a chapel for making arrangements for funeral
services, selling funeral merchandise to the public by photograph, video, or computer based
presentation, or making financial arrangements for the rendering of the service or sale of supplies,
provided that the uses are secondary and incidental to and do not interfere with the reposing of
dead human bodies, visitation, or funeral ceremony.
Page 40 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

(h) All public health laws and rules apply to funeral establishments. In addition, all
funeral establishments must comply with all of the standards established by the rules adopted by
the Board.
(i) No funeral establishment shall use an unregistered or a misleading name. Misleading
names include, but are not limited to, names in the plural form when there is only one funeral
establishment, the use of names of deceased individuals, unless the establishment is licensed
using the name at the time the new application is made, the use of names of individuals not
associated with the establishment, and the use of the word "crematory" or "crematorium" words
"crematory," "crematorium," or "crematory center" in the name of a funeral establishment that
does not own a crematory. share a facility or other contiguous real property with a crematory
licensee. If an owner of a funeral establishment owns more than one funeral establishment,
establishment or chapel, the owner may not use the word "crematory" or "crematorium"
"crematory," "crematorium," or "cremation center" in the name of more than one of its funeral
establishments; except that each funeral home having a crematory licensee on the premises may
contain the term "crematory" or "crematorium" "crematory," "crematorium," or "cremation
center" in its name.
(j) A funeral establishment will not use any name other than the name by which it is
properly registered with the Board.
(k) Human remains shall be stored in a funeral establishment, a licensed crematory, or an
embalming facility at all times when the remains are not in transit or at a gravesite, church, or
other facility or residence for the purpose of a visitation or funeral service.
(l) Unembalmed human remains retained in the custody of a funeral establishment for
more than 24 hours shall be kept in a refrigeration unit.Funeral establishments and crematories
shall refrigerate a deceased body at a temperature not greater than 40 degrees Fahrenheit unless
final disposition will occur within 24 hours of the time that the funeral establishment or crematory
takes custody."
SECTION 3.9. G.S. 90-210.28 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.28. Fees.
The Board may set and collect fees, not to exceed the following amounts:
Funeral Establishment and Branch Funeral Establishment permit
Application .................................................. $400.00
Annual renewal ............................................. 250.00
Late renewal .................................................. 150.00
Establishment and embalming facility reinspection fee........ 150.00
Courtesy card
Application .................................................... 100.00
Annual renewal ............................................... 75.00
Out-of-state licensee
Application .................................................... 250.00
Embalmer, funeral director, funeral service
Application-NorthApplication
-North Carolina-Resident .............................. 200.00
-Non-Resident ............................................... 250.00
Annual Renewal-embalmer orRenewal
-Embalmer or funeral director ......................... 75.00
Total fee, embalmer and funeral director
when both are held by the same person ........ 100.00
-funeral service .............................................. 100.00
Inactive Status ................................................. 50.00
Reinstatement fee ............................................ 50.00
Resident trainee permit
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 41

Application ...................................................... 50.00
Voluntary change in supervisor ...................... 50.00
Annual renewal ............................................... 35.00
Late renewal .................................................... 25.00
Duplicate license certificate ............................ 25.00
Chapel registration
Application .................................................... 150.00
Annual renewal ............................................. 100.00
Late renewal .................................................... 75.00
The Board shall provide, without charge, one copy of the current statutes and regulations
relating to Funeral Service to every person applying for and paying the appropriate fees for
licensing pursuant to this Article. The Board may charge all others requesting copies of the
current statutes and regulations, and the licensees or applicants requesting additional copies, a
fee equal to the costs of production and distribution of the requested documents.The Board shall
cause to be published the current statutes and rules related to the practice of funeral service on
its website."
SECTION 3.10. G.S. 90-210.29A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.29A. Identification of bodies before burial or cremation.
The funeral director or person otherwise responsible Upon taking physical custody of a dead
human body, any licensee under this Article or Article 13F of this Chapter, or an authorized
representative of a licensee, shall affix on the ankle or wrist of the decedent a durable tag
permanently marked with the decedent's name and date of death. The licensee or the licensee's
authorized representative, or the person otherwise responsible for the final disposition of a dead
human body shall, prior to the interment or entombment of the dead body, affix on the ankle or
wrist of the dead body, or, if cremated, on the inside of the temporary container or urn containing
the remains of the dead body, a tag of durable, noncorroding material permanently marked with
the name of the deceased, the date of death, the social security number of the deceased, the county
and state of death, and the site of interment or entombment."
SECTION 3.11. G.S. 90-210.29B reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.29B. Exemptions from public records.
(a) The examination scores of applicants for licensure shall not be subject to the
provisions of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. The Board shall release to any person
requesting examination scores whether or not the applicant has obtained a passing score within
a reasonable amount of time.
(b) Records, papers, investigative files, investigative reports, other investigative
information, and other documents containing information collected or compiled by or on behalf
of the Board in the possession of, or received or gathered by, the Board or its members,
employees, or consultants as a result of a complaint, an investigation, inquiry, assessment, audit,
disciplinary matter, or interview in connection with conducted in connection with a licensing,
complaint, or disciplinary matter involving a licensee, permittee, or registrant, or any application
for a license, permit, or registration, shall not be considered public records within the meaning
of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Statutes and are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or
other means of legal compulsion for release to any person other than the Board, its employees,
or consultants involved in the application for license, assessment, or discipline of a license holder.
Any notice of hearing or decision rendered in connection with a hearing shall be a public record
subject to inspection."
PART IV. PRENEED FUNERAL FUNDS CHANGES
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 90-210.60, as amended by Section 2.1(a) of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"Article 13D.
Page 42 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

"Preneed Funeral Funds.
"§ 90-210.60. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Board" means the Board. ‒ The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service as
created pursuant to Article 13A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes;Statutes.
(1a) Cash advance item. ‒ Any item obtained from a third party and paid for by the
funeral provider on the purchaser's behalf. Cash advance items may include,
but are not limited to, sales tax, certified copies of death certificates, clergy
honoraria, flowers, musicians or singers, obituary notices, and gratuities.
(2) "Financial institution" means a Financial institution. ‒ A bank, credit union,
trust company, savings bank, or savings and loan association authorized by
law to do business in this State;State.
(3) "Insurance company" means any Insurance company. ‒ Any corporation,
limited liability company, association, partnership, society, order, individual
or aggregation of individuals engaging in or proposing or attempting to engage
as principals in any kind of insurance business, including the exchanging of
reciprocal or interinsurance contracts between individuals, partnerships, and
corporations;corporations.
(3a) "Legal representative" means the Legal representative. ‒The person
authorized by G.S. 130A-420 who would be otherwise authorized to dispose
of the remains of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary.
(4) "Prearrangement insurance policy" means a Prearrangement insurance policy.
‒ A life insurance policy, annuity contract, or other insurance contract, or any
series of contracts or agreements in any form or manner, issued by an
insurance company authorized by law to do business in this State, which,
whether by assignment or otherwise, has for a purpose the funding of a
preneed funeral contract or an insurance-funded funeral or burial
prearrangement, the insured or annuitant being the person for whose service
the funds were paid;paid.
(5) "Preneed funeral contract" means any Preneed funeral contract. ‒ Any
contract, agreement, or mutual understanding, or any series or combination of
contracts, agreements, or mutual understandings, whether funded by trust
deposits or prearrangement insurance policies, or any combination thereof,
which has for a purpose the furnishing or performance of funeral services, or
the furnishing or delivery of personal property, merchandise, or services of
any nature in connection with the final disposition of a dead human body, to
be furnished or delivered at a time determinable by the death of the person
whose body is to be disposed of, but does not mean the furnishing of a
cemetery lot, crypt, niche, or mausoleum. mausoleum, outer burial containers,
or pre-installed interment receptacle sold by a cemetery that is regulated by
the Cemetery Commission. The term does not include a transportation
protection agreement.
(6) "Preneed funeral contract beneficiary" means the Preneed funeral contract
beneficiary. ‒ The person upon whose death the preneed funeral contract will
be performed; this person may also be the purchaser of the preneed funeral
contract;contract.
(7) "Preneed funeral funds" means all Preneed funeral funds. ‒ All payments of
cash made to any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other entity
upon any preneed funeral contract or any other agreement, contract, or
prearrangement insurance policy, or any series or combination of preneed
funeral contracts or any other agreements, contracts, or prearrangement
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 43

insurance policies, but excluding the furnishing of cemetery lots, crypts,
niches, and mausoleums, mausoleums, outer burial containers, or pre-installed
interment receptacles sold by a cemetery regulated by the Cemetery
Commission, which have for a purpose or which by operation provide for the
furnishing or performance of funeral or burial services, or the furnishing or
delivery of personal property, merchandise, or services of any nature in
connection with the final disposition of a dead human body, to be furnished
or delivered at a time determinable by the death of the person whose body is
to be disposed of, or the providing of the proceeds of any insurance policy for
such use;use.
(8) "Preneed funeral planning" means offering Preneed funeral planning. ‒
Offering to sell or selling preneed funeral contracts, or making other
arrangements prior to death for the providing of funeral services or
merchandise;merchandise.
(9) "Preneed licensee" means a Preneed licensee. ‒A funeral establishment which
has applied for and has been granted a license to sell preneed funeral contracts
under the Article. Such license is also referred to in this Article as a "preneed
funeral establishment license."license" or "preneed funeral establishment
permit."
(10) "Transportation protection agreement" means an Transportation protection
agreement. ‒ An agreement, sold separately from a preneed funeral contract,
that primarily provides for the coordination and arranging of all professional
services related to the preparation of human remains or cremated remains for
the purpose of initial and subsequent transportation of those remains."
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 90-210.61 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.61. Deposit or application of preneed funeral funds.
…
(d) Funds deposited in trust under a revocable standard preneed funeral contract under a
revocable or irrevocable preneed funeral contract may, with the written permission of the preneed
funeral contract purchaser, be withdrawn by the trustee and used to purchase a prearrangement
insurance policy. Except as provided in this subsection, no funds deposited in trust in a financial
institution pursuant to this Article shall be withdrawn by the trustee to purchase a prearrangement
insurance policy. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to permit the revocation of an
irrevocable preneed funeral contract and all funds withdrawn from trust pursuant to this
subsection shall be applied to the purchase of a prearrangement insurance policy.
…."
SECTION 4.3. G.S. 90-210.62 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.62. Types of preneed funeral contracts; forms.
…
(b) The Board may prescribe forms for preneed funeral contracts consistent with this
Article. All contracts must be in writing on forms prescribed by the Board. Any use or attempted
use of any oral preneed funeral contract or any written contract in a form not prescribed by the
Board shall be deemed a violation of this Article. The preneed funeral contract purchaser may
specify in writing religious practices that conflict with this Article or Article 13A or 13F of this
Chapter. The preneed licensee shall observe those religious practices except where they interfere
with cremation in a licensed crematory as specified under G.S. 90-210.123 or the required
documentation and record keeping."
SECTION 4.4. G.S. 90-210.63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.63. Substitution of licensee.
(a) If the preneed funeral contract is irrevocable, the preneed funeral contract purchaser,
or after his death the preneed funeral contract beneficiary or his legal representative, upon written
Page 44 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

notice to the financial institution or insurance company and the preneed licensee who is a party
to the preneed funeral contract, may direct the substitution of a different funeral establishment to
furnish funeral services and merchandise.
(1) If the substitution is made after the death of the preneed funeral contract
beneficiary, a funeral establishment providing any funeral services or
merchandise need not be a preneed licensee under this Article to receive
payment for such services or merchandise. The original contracting preneed
licensee shall be entitled to payment for any services or merchandise provided
pursuant to G.S. 90-210.65(d). If the substitution is made before the death of
the preneed funeral contract beneficiary, the substitution must be to a preneed
licensee. If the preneed funeral contract is funded by a trust deposit or
deposits, the financial institution shall immediately pay the funds held to the
original contracting successor preneed licensee.
(2) The original contracting preneed licensee shall immediately pay all funds
received to the successor funeral establishment designated. Regardless of
whether the substitution is made before or after the death of the preneed
funeral contract beneficiary, the original contracting preneed licensee shall not
be required to give credit for the amount retained pursuant to
G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2), except when there was a substitution under
G.S. 90-210.68(d1) and (e). Upon making payments substitution pursuant to
this subsection, the financial institution and the original contracting preneed
licensee shall be relieved from all further contractual liability thereon.
(3) If the preneed funeral contract is funded by a prearrangement insurance
policy, the insurance company shall not pay any of the funds until the death
of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary, and the insurance company shall
pay the funds in accordance with the terms of the policy.
(b) The person giving notice of the substitution of a preneed licensee and the successor
preneed licensee shall enter into a new preneed funeral contract for the funds transferred, and this
Article shall apply, including the duty of the successor preneed licensee to deposit all of the funds
in a financial institution if the death of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary has not occurred.
trust or insurance product consistent with this Article. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to permit the use of the transferred funds to purchase a prearrangement insurance
policy, nor to permit an irrevocable preneed funeral contract to be made revocable or to result in
the payment of any of the transferred funds to the preneed funeral contract purchaser or to the
preneed funeral contract beneficiary or his estate, except as provided by G.S. 90-210.64(b).
(c) Any licensee holding a permit under Articles 13A or 13F of this Chapter that accepts
the transfer of a preneed funeral contract after the death of the preneed contract beneficiary shall
file the certificate of performance with the Board and mail a copy to the contracting preneed
licensee. If the preneed funeral contract is performed by a funeral establishment in another state,
the original contracting preneed licensee shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the information
needed to accurately complete the certificate of performance and shall file the certificate no later
than the time allowed under G.S. 90-210.64."
SECTION 4.5. G.S. 90-210.64 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.64. Death of preneed funeral contract beneficiary; disposition of funds.
(a) After the death of a preneed funeral contract beneficiary and full performance of the
preneed funeral contract by the preneed licensee, the performing preneed licensee shall promptly
complete a certificate of performance and present it to the financial institution that holds funds
in trust under G.S. 90-210.61(a)(1) or to the insurance company that issued a preneed insurance
policy pursuant to G.S. 90-210.61(a)(3). Upon receipt of the certificate of performance or similar
claim form, the financial institution shall pay the trust funds to the contracting performing
preneed licensee and the insurance company shall pay the insurance proceeds according to the
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 45

terms of the policy. Within 10 days after receiving payment, the performing preneed licensee
shall file a copy of the certificate of performance or other claim form to the Board.
(b) Unless otherwise specified in the preneed funeral contract, the preneed licensee shall
have no obligation to deliver merchandise or perform any services for which payment in full has
not yet been deposited with a financial institution or that will not be provided by the proceeds of
a prearrangement insurance policy. Any such amounts received which do not constitute payment
in full shall be refunded to the estate of the deceased preneed funeral contract beneficiary or
credited against the cost of merchandise or services contracted for by a representative of the
deceased. Any balance remaining after payment for the merchandise and services as set forth in
the preneed funeral contract shall be paid to the estate of the preneed funeral contract beneficiary
or the prearrangement insurance policy beneficiary named to receive any such balance. Provided,
however, unless the parties agree to the contrary, there shall be no refund to the estate of the
preneed funeral contract beneficiary of an inflation-proof preneed funeral contract except as
required by G.S. 90-210.63A(c).
(c) In the event that any person other than the contracting preneed licensee performs any
funeral service or provides any merchandise as a result of the death of the preneed funeral
contract beneficiary, the financial institution shall pay the trust funds to the contracting
performing preneed licensee and the insurance company shall pay the insurance proceeds
according to the terms of the policy. The preneed licensee shall, subject to the provisions of
G.S. 90-210.65(d), immediately pay the monies so received to the other provider.The performing
preneed licensee shall provide the contracting preneed licensee with a copy of the certificate of
performance prepared for the decedent contemporaneously upon submission to the Board on or
before 10 days of payment.
(d) When the balance of a preneed funeral fund is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less
and is payable to the estate of a deceased preneed funeral contract beneficiary and there has been
no representative of the estate appointed, the balance due may be paid directly to a beneficiary
or to the beneficiaries of the estate. If the balance of a preneed funeral fund exceeds one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or is not payable to the estate, the balance must be paid into the office of the
clerk of superior court in the county where probate proceedings could be filed for the deceased
preneed funeral contract beneficiary.
(e) Upon For trust funded preneed funeral contracts, upon the fulfillment of a preneed
contract, all of the following items shall be completed within 30 days:
(1) The contracting performing preneed licensee must submit a certificate of
performance or similar claim form to the financial institution holding the
preneed trust funds and close the preneed account.
(2) The proceeds of this trust account shall be distributed according to the terms
of the preneed contract.
(3) A completed copy of the certificate of performance or similar claim form
evidencing the final disposition of any financial institution preneed trust
account funds must be filed with the Board by the contracting performing
licensee."
SECTION 4.6. G.S. 90-210.67 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.67. Application for license.
…
(b) An application for a preneed funeral establishment license shall be accompanied by a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00). The Board shall
set the amounts of the application fees and renewal fees, by rule.
If the license is granted, the application fee shall be applied to the annual license fee for the
first year or part thereof. Upon receipt of the application and payment of the application fee, the
Board shall issue a renewable preneed funeral establishment license unless it determines that the
applicant has violated any provision of G.S. 90-210.69(c) or has made false statements or
Page 46 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

representations in the application, or is insolvent, or has conducted or is about to conduct, its
business in a fraudulent manner, or is not duly authorized to transact business in this State. The
license shall expire on December 31 and each preneed funeral establishment licensee shall pay
annually to the Board on or before that date a license renewal fee of not more than two hundred
fifty dollars ($250.00). On or after After February 1, a license may be renewed by paying a late
fee of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to the annual renewal fee. Preneed
funeral establishment permits that remain expired six months or more cannot be renewed and
establishments must reapply for licensure pursuant to this subsection.
If, after January 1, 2008, a funeral establishment receiving a new preneed establishment
license or if a preneed establishment license has lapsed or has been terminated for any reason,
other than for failure to timely renew the license, the funeral establishment shall obtain a surety
bond in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a period of at least two years;
provided, however, that the Board, in its discretion, may require the term of the surety bond to
be for five years. However, upon demonstrating to the satisfaction of the Board that the funeral
establishment is solvent, the Board may reduce the bond term to a period of no less than one year
from the date the original license is issued. The funeral establishment may (i) purchase the bond
from any company authorized by law to sell bonds in this State or (ii) deposit fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) with the clerk of superior court in the county where the preneed funeral
establishment maintains its facility that is licensed or has submitted an application for licensure
to the Board. The Board may extend the bonding requirement beyond a period of five years in
the event there is a claim paid from the bond.
(c) An application for a preneed sales license shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable
application fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). The Board shall set the amounts of the
application fees and renewal fees by rule, but the fees shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00). If
the license is granted, the application fee shall be applied to the annual license fee for the first
year or part thereof. Upon receipt of the application and payment of the application fee, the Board
shall issue a renewable preneed sales license provided the applicant has met the qualifications to
engage in preneed funeral planning as established by the Board unless it determines that the
applicant has violated any provision of G.S. 90-210.69(c). The license shall expire on December
31 and each preneed sales licensee shall pay annually to the Board on or before that date a license
renewal fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). On or after After February 1, a license may
be renewed by paying a late fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) in addition to the
annual renewal fee.
…."
SECTION 4.7. G.S. 90-210.68 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.68. Licensee's books and records; notice of transfers, assignments and
terminations.
…
(a1) On or before March 31, 31 of each year, each preneed licensee shall prepare and
submit an annual report on its preneed funeral contract sales and during the previous calendar
year, to include the total number, status, and type of each preneed contract for which the preneed
licensee serves as trustee, the total year-end balance of each contract, and the status of each
preneed contract. The preneed licensee shall submit the report to the Board in a manner and form
prescribed by the Board.
…
(c) If any preneed licensee transfers or assigns its assets or stock to a successor funeral
establishment or terminates its business as a funeral establishment, the preneed licensee and
assignee shall notify the Board at least 30 days prior to the effective date of the transfer,
assignment or termination: provided, however, the successor funeral establishment must be a
preneed licensee in good standing with the Board or shall be required to apply for and be granted
such license by the Board before accepting any preneed funeral contracts, whether funded by
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 47

trust deposits or preneed insurance policies. Provided further, a successor funeral establishment
shall be liable to the preneed funeral contract purchasers for the amount of contract payments
retained by the assigning or transferring funeral home pursuant to G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2).
(d) Financial institutions that accept preneed funeral trust funds and insurance companies
that issue or assign insurance policies that are used to fund preneed funeral contracts shall, upon
request by the Board or its inspectors or examiners, disclose any information regarding preneed
funeral trust accounts held or any insurance policies used to fund a preneed funeral contract.and,
for any insurance policy that names a funeral establishment as an assignee or beneficiary, the
issuing or underwriting insurance company shall, upon request by the Board or its inspectors,
disclose any information regarding the preneed funeral trust accounts or any insurance policy
that names a funeral establishment as an assignee or beneficiary.
Financial institutions that accept preneed funeral trust funds and insurance companies that
issue or assign insurance policy proceeds or designate a preneed funeral establishment as a policy
beneficiary or owner and, for any insurance policy that names a funeral establishment as an
assignee or beneficiary, the issuing or underwriting insurance company shall also forward an the
account balance or policy status and current death benefit to the contracting preneed funeral
establishment or the funeral establishment named as an assignee or beneficiary at the end of each
calendar year.
(d1) When a preneed funeral establishment license lapses or is terminated for any reason,
the preneed licensee shall immediately divest of all the unperformed preneed funeral contracts
and shall transfer them and any amounts retained under G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2) to another a
successor preneed funeral establishment licensee in good standing with the Board pursuant to the
procedures of subsection (e) of this section. The contracting and the successor preneed funeral
establishments shall notify the Board at least 30 days prior to such transfer. Within 30 days
following the transfer, the contracting and successor preneed funeral establishments shall provide
notice of the transfer to each preneed contract purchaser and to the financial institution housing
the preneed funeral trust funds or the issuing or underwriting insurance company for the
contracts.
(e) In the event that any preneed licensee is unable or unwilling or is for any reason
relieved of its responsibility to perform as trustee or to perform any preneed funeral contract, the
Board shall order the contract and any amounts retained pursuant to G.S. 90-210.61(a)(2) to be
assigned to a substitute preneed licensee provided that neither the substitute preneed licensee or
preneed contract purchaser, or after the death of the preneed contract purchaser, the preneed
contract beneficiary or his or her legal representative, shall be obligated to perform the agreement
without executing a new preneed funeral contract. Any lapse or transfer of a preneed contract
pursuant to this section shall not be grounds to revoke an irrevocable preneed funeral contract.
(f) The substitute preneed licensee under subsections (d1) and (e) of this section shall be
liable to the preneed funeral contract purchasers for the amount of contract payments that had
been retained by, and that the substitute preneed licensee has received from, the assigning
preneed licensee."
SECTION 4.8. G.S. 90-210.69 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.69. Rulemaking; enforcement of Article; judicial review; determination of
penalty amount.
(a) The Board is authorized to adopt rules for the carrying out and enforcement of the
provisions of this Article. The Board may perform such other acts and exercise such other powers
and duties as are authorized by this Article and by Article 13A of this Chapter to carry out its
powers and duties.
(b) The Board may administer oaths and issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of
persons and the production of papers and records in any investigation conducted by it. Members
of the Board's staff or the sheriff or other appropriate official of any county of this State shall
serve all notices, subpoenas and other papers given to them by the Board for service in the same
Page 48 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

manner as process issued by any court of record. Any person who does not obey a subpoena
issued by the Board shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined
or imprisoned in the discretion of the court.
(b1) Upon determining that it is necessary for the protection of the interest of a preneed
contract purchaser or beneficiary, the Board may issue a written order to direct that the preneed
funds of any preneed licensee on deposit in any institution operating under this Article be frozen
and not paid out by such legal entity. Any legal entity freezing the preneed funds pursuant to the
directive of the Board shall not be liable for freezing an account pursuant to an order of the Board.
(c) The Board may place on probation, refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke a
preneed license when an owner, partner, manager, member, operator, officer, or preneed
salesperson of the preneed funeral licensee violates any provision of this Article or any rules
adopted by the Board, or when any agent or employee of the preneed funeral establishment, with
the consent of any person, firm, or corporation operating the funeral establishment, violates any
of these provisions, rules, or regulations. In accordance with the provisions of Chapter 150B of
the General Statutes, if the Board finds that a licensee, an applicant for a license or an applicant
for license renewal is guilty of one or more of the following, the Board may refuse to issue or
renew a license or may suspend or revoke a license or place the holder thereof on probation upon
conditions set by the Board, with revocation upon failure to comply with the conditions:
(1) Offering to engage or engaging in activities for which a license is required
under this Article but without having obtained such a license.
(2) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation or other entity to offer to engage or engage in such activities.
(3) A crime involving fraud or moral turpitude by conviction thereof.Conviction
of, or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony or a misdemeanor that
indicates that the individual is unfit or incompetent to engage in preneed
funeral service or that the individual has deceived or defrauded the public.
(4) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or receiving a license in preneed
funeral planning or in the operation of a licensee's business.
(5) False or misleading advertising.
(6) Violating or cooperating with others to violate any provision of this Article or
Article 13A, 13E, or 13F of this Chapter, the rules and regulations of the
Board, or the standards set forth in Funeral Industry Practices, 16 C.F.R. 453
(1984), as amended from time to time.
(7) Denial, suspension, or revocation of an occupational or business license by
another jurisdiction.
(8) Failure to refund any insurance proceeds received as consideration in excess
of the funeral contract purchase price within 30 days of receipt; provided,
however, that this provision shall not be construed to include interest or
growth on funds paid toward funeral goods and services to be provided
pursuant to an inflation-proof preneed contract.
(9) Failure to provide, within a reasonable time, either the goods and services
contracted for or a refund for the price of goods and services paid but not
fulfilled.
(10) Violation of G.S. 58-58-97.
(11) Failure to respond to the Board's inquiries in a reasonable manner or time
regarding any matter affecting the individual's performance of preneed funeral
services.
Revocation of a funeral establishment permit granted pursuant to G.S. 90-210.25(d)(2) shall
result in the automatic revocation of the firm's preneed funeral establishment permit by operation
of law. Active suspension of a funeral establishment permit granted pursuant to
G.S. 90-210.25(d)(2) shall result in the automatic active suspension of the firm's preneed funeral
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 49

establishment permit for the same length of time by operation of law. In any case in which the
Board is authorized to take any of the actions permitted under this subsection, the Board may
instead accept an offer in compromise of the charges whereby the accused shall pay to the Board
a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). In any case in which the Board is
entitled to place a licensee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose a penalty of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with such probation. The Board may
determine the length and conditions of any period of probation, revocation, suspension, or refusal
to issue or renew a license.
(d) Any proceedings pertaining to or actions against a funeral establishment under this
Article may be in addition to any proceedings or actions permitted by G.S. 90-210.25(d)(4). Any
proceedings pertaining to or actions against a person licensed for funeral directing or funeral
service may be in addition to any proceedings or actions permitted by G.S. 90-210.25 (e)(1) and
(2).
(e) Judicial review shall be pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(f) In determining the amount of any penalty imposed or assessed under Article 13 of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, the Board shall consider:
(1) The degree and extent of harm to the public health, safety, and welfare, or to
property, or the potential for harm.
(2) The duration and gravity of the violation.
(3) Whether the violation was committed willfully or intentionally or reflects a
continuing pattern.
(4) Whether the violation involved elements of fraud or deception either to the
public or to the Board, or both.
(5) The violator's prior disciplinary record with the Board.
(6) Whether and the extent to which the violator profited by the violation."
SECTION 4.9. G.S. 90-210.70 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.70. Penalties.
…
(e) Whenever it shall appear to the Board that any person, firm, or corporation has
violated, threatens to violate, or is violating any provisions of this Article, the Board may apply
to the courts of the State for a restraining order and injunction to restrain these practices. If upon
application the court finds that any provision of this Article is being violated, or a violation is
threatened, the court shall issue an order restraining and enjoining the violations, and this relief
may be granted regardless of whether criminal prosecution is instituted under the provisions of
this subsection. The venue for actions brought under this subsection shall be the superior court
of (i) any county in which the acts are alleged to have been committed or in committed, (ii) the
county where the defendant in the action resides.resides, or (iii) Wake County."
SECTION 4.10. G.S. 90-210.73 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.73. Not public record.
The following records or documents shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 132 of
the General Statutes:Statutes and are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal
compulsion for release:
(1) The names and addresses of the purchasers and beneficiaries of preneed
Preneed funeral contracts filed with the Board.
(2) All financial information used to demonstrate solvency in connection with a
bond required under G.S. 90-210.67.G.S. 90-210.67 or application for
preneed funeral establishment permit."
PART V. RULEMAKING AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.1. The North Carolina Board of Funeral Service may adopt temporary
rules to implement the provisions of this act. Temporary rules adopted in accordance with this
Page 50 Session Law 2025-76 House Bill 1003

section shall remain in effect until permanent rules that replace the temporary rules become
effective.
SECTION 5.1A.(a) G.S. 90-210.25(a2)(2) is repealed.
SECTION 5.1A.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2030.
SECTION 5.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 10:03 a.m. this 9th day of July, 2025
House Bill 1003 Session Law 2025-76 Page 51